West Virginia, session 2026, SB1065.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 11. TAXATION. ARTICLE 16. NONINTOXICATING BEER. §11-16-6b. Brewpub, Class A retail dealer, Class B retail dealer, private club type, Class A retail licensee, and Class B retail licensee’s authority to sell growlers. (a) Legislative findings. — The Legislature hereby finds that it is in the public interest to regulate, control, and support the brewing, manufacturing, distribution, sale, consumption, transportation, and storage of nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer and its industry in this state in order to protect the public health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this state and promote hospitality and tourism. Therefore, this section authorizes a licensed brewpub, Class A retail dealer, Class B retail dealer, private club type, Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee to have certain abilities in order to promote the sale of nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer manufactured in this state for the benefit of the citizens of this state, the state’s growing brewing industry, and the state’s hospitality and tourism industry, all of which are vital components for the state’s economy.(b) Sales of nonintoxicating beer. — A licensed brewpub, Class A retail dealer, Class B retail dealer, private club type, Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee who pays the fee in subsection (i) of this section and meets the requirements of this section may offer nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for retail sale to patrons from their licensed premises in a growler for personal consumption only off of the licensed premises and not for resale. Prior to the sale, the licensee shall verify, using proper identification, that any patron purchasing nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer is 21 years of age or over and that the patron is not visibly intoxicated. A licensee authorized under this section may not sell, give or furnish alcoholic liquors, including wine, for consumption off of its licensed premises, unless it is a private club type licensed to sell sealed wine for consumption off of the licensed premises and meets the requirements set out in §60-8-3(j) and §60-8-3(l) of this code, for the sale of wine, not liquor.(c) Retail sales. — Every licensee authorized under this section shall comply with all the provisions of this article as applicable to nonintoxicating beer retailers when conducting sales of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer and shall be subject to all applicable requirements and penalties in this article.(d) Payment of taxes and fees. — A licensee authorized under this section shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed nonintoxicating beer retailers, in addition to any other taxes and fees required, and meet applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rule of the commissioner.(e) Advertising. — A licensee authorized under this section may advertise a particular brand or brands of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer and the price of the nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer subject to state and federal requirements or restrictions. The advertisement may not encourage intemperance.(f) Growler requirements. — A licensee authorized under this section must fill a growler and patrons are not permitted to access the secure area or fill a growler. A licensee authorized under this section must sanitize, fill, securely seal, and label any growler prior to its sale. A licensee authorized under this section may only offer for retail sale growlers no larger than 128 fluid ounces of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for personal consumption off of the licensed premises and not for resale. A licensee under this section may refill a growler subject to the requirements of this section. A licensee shall visually inspect any growler before filling or refilling it. A licensee may not fill or refill any growler that appears to be cracked, broken, unsafe, or otherwise unfit to serve as a sealed beverage container.(g) Growler labeling. — A licensee authorized under this section selling growlers shall affix a conspicuous label on all sold and securely sealed growlers listing the name of the licensee selling the growler, the brand of the nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in the growler, the alcohol content by volume of the nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in the growler, and the date the growler was filled or refilled, and, further, all labeling on the growler shall be consistent with all federal labeling and warning requirements.(h) Growler sanitation. — A licensed brewer or resident brewer authorized under this section shall clean and sanitize all growlers he or she fills or refills in accordance with all state and county health requirements prior to its sealing. In addition, the licensed brewer or resident brewer shall sanitize, in accordance with all state and county health requirements, all taps, tap lines, pipe lines, barrel tubes, and any other related equipment used to fill or refill growlers. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in penalties under §11-16-23 of this code.(i) Fees. — Commencing July 1, 2015, and every July 1 thereafter July 1, 2026, there is an no annual $100 nonrefundable fee for a licensee. except for a licensed brewpub, to sell growlers as provided by this section. The licensee must be in good standing with the state at the time of paying the fee application and renewal. (j) Complimentary samples. — A licensee authorized under this section may provide complimentary samples, which may be no greater than one ounce per sample and a sampling shall not exceed three different nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer complimentary one-ounce samples per patron per day. A licensee authorized under this section providing complimentary samples shall, prior to any sampling, verify, using proper identification, that the patron sampling is 21 years of age or over and that the patron is not visibly intoxicated. All nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer utilized for sampling purposes must be purchased from the licensee’s inventory.(k) Limitations on licensees. — A licensee under this section may only sell growlers during the hours of operation set forth in §11-16-18(a)(1) of this code. Any licensee licensed under this section must maintain a secure area for the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in a growler. The secure area must only be accessible by the licensee. Any licensee licensed under this section shall be subject to the applicable penalties under §11-16-23 of this code for violations of this section.(l) Nonapplicability of certain statutes. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, licensees under this section are permitted to break the seal of the original container for the limited purpose of filling a growler or providing complimentary samples as provided in this section. Any unauthorized sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer or any consumption not permitted on the licensee’s licensed premises is subject to penalties under this article.(m) Rules. — The commissioner is authorized to propose rules for legislative approval, pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, to implement this section. §11-16-6c. Class B retail dealer which is a grocery store, mobile application, or web-based sales privilege permit; fee. (a) A Class B retail dealer who is licensed to sell nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer and who operates a grocery store containing over $100,000 of fresh produce and saleable food and food products fit for human consumption in a combination of displayed and stored inventory may apply for a Class B license privilege granting the licensee the ability to complete the sale of such nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in the original sealed container for off-premises consumption to a person purchasing the nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer from a vehicle: (1) If the vehicle is parked in a licensed parking area which is contiguous to the Class B licensee’s licensed premises; or(2) If the vehicle is parked in a licensed parking area which is within 500 feet of the Class B licensee.(b) The parking area referenced in subsection (a) of this section shall be designated by signage solely for the use of persons who have previously ordered items including, but not limited to, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer using a mobile application or web-based software program.(c) No nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer may be loaded into a vehicle under this section unless the Class B licensee or such licensee’s staff have verified that both the person placing the order, and, if different from the person placing the order, the person picking up the order are 21 years of age or older and not noticeably intoxicated; and(d) To operate under this section, a Class B retail dealer licensee must be in good standing with the commissioner, apply, qualify, pay the Class B license privilege fee and obtain the permit for the Class B licensee privilege for nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer sales at a designated parking area. The Beginning July 1, 2026, the Class B license privilege permit nonrefundable and non-prorated annual fee is $250 has no annual fee. For purposes of criminal enforcement of the provisions of this article, persons placing orders and picking up orders are deemed to be purchasers.(e) The licensee shall be subject to all requirements, penalties, and sanctions of this article. §11-16-9. Amount of license tax; Class A and Class B retail dealers; purchase and sale of nonintoxicating beer permitted; distributors; brewers; brewpubs. (a) All retail dealers, distributors, brewpubs, brewers, and resident brewers of nonintoxicating beer and of nonintoxicating craft beer shall pay an annual fee to maintain an active license as required by this article. The license period begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of the following year: If the license is granted for a shorter period, then the license fee shall be computed semiannually in proportion to the remainder of the fiscal year: Provided, That if a licensee fails to complete a renewal application and make payment of its annual license fee in renewing its license on or before June 30 of any subsequent year, then an additional $150 reactivation fee shall be charged and paid by the licensee; the fee may not be prorated or refunded, prior to the processing of any renewal application and applicable full year annual license fee; and furthermore, a licensee who continues to operate after the expiration of its license is subject to all fines, penalties, and sanctions available in §11-16-23 of this code, all as determined by the commissioner.(b) The annual license fees are as follows:(1) Retail dealers shall be divided into two classes: Class A and Class B. (A) For a Class A retail dealer, the license fee is $150 $500 for each place of business: the license fee for social, fraternal, or private clubs not operating for profit, and which have been in continuous operation for two years or more immediately preceding the date of application, is $150: Provided, That railroads operating in this state may dispense nonintoxicating beer upon payment of an annual license tax of $10 for each dining, club, or buffet car in which the beer is dispensed.Class A licenses issued for railroad dining, club, or buffet cars authorize the licensee to sell nonintoxicating beer at retail for consumption only on the licensed premises where sold. All other Class A licensees may sell nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer at retail, as licensed, for consumption on the licensed premises or off the licensed premises. Class A licensees may sell nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for consumption off the licensed premises when it is in a sealed original container and sold for personal use, and not for resale. Class A licensees shall provide prepared food or meals along with sealed nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in the original container or in a sealed growler as set forth for sales and service in §11-16-6d of this code, to a purchasing person who is in-person or in-vehicle picking up prepared food or a meal, and sealed nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer orders-to-go, subject to verification that the purchasing person is 21 years of age or older, and not visibly or noticeably intoxicated, and as otherwise specified in this article.  (B) For a Class B retail dealer, the license fee, authorizing the sale of both chilled and unchilled beer, is $150 $250 for each place of business. A Class B license authorizes the licensee to sell nonintoxicating beer at retail in bottles, cans, or other sealed containers only, and only for consumption off the licensed premises. A Class B retailer may sell to a purchasing person, for personal use, and not for resale, quantities of draught beer in original containers that are no larger in size than one-half barrel for off-premises consumption. The commissioner may only issue a Class B license to the proprietor or owner of a grocery store. For the purpose of this article, the term "grocery store" means any retail establishment commonly known as a grocery store or delicatessen, and caterer or party supply store, where food or food products are sold for consumption off the premises, and includes a separate and segregated portion of any other retail store which is dedicated solely to the sale of food, food products, and supplies for the table for consumption off the premises. Caterers or party supply stores shall purchase the appropriate licenses from the Alcohol Beverage Control Administration.(C) A Class A retail dealer may contract, purchase, or develop a mobile ordering application or web-based software program to permit the ordering and purchase of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, as authorized by the licensee's license. The nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer shall be in a sealed original container or a sealed growler and meet the requirements of §11-16-6d of this code. (2) For a distributor, the license fee is $1,000 for each place of business.(3) For a brewer or a resident brewer with its principal place of business or manufacture located in this state and who produces:(A) Twelve thousand five hundred barrels or less of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, the license fee is $250 for each place of manufacture, and no more than three places of manufacture are permitted for licensure;(B) Twelve thousand five hundred one barrels and up to 25,000 barrels of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, the license fee is $1,000 for each place of manufacture, and no more than five places of manufacture are permitted for licensure;(C) More than 25,001 barrels of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, the license fee is $1,500 for each place of manufacture.(D) A brewer or resident brewer licensed under paragraph (A) or (B) of this subdivision shall receive one license for use at all places of manufacture; each place of manufacture shall meet all licensing requirements in this article and the rules; and all places of manufacture shall be noted on the one brewer or resident brewer license in compliance with §11-16-5 and §11-16-6a(k) of this code.(4) For a brewer whose principal place of business or manufacture is not located in this state, the license fee is $1,500. The brewer is exempt from the requirements set out in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section: Provided, That a brewer whose principal place of business or manufacture is not located in this state that produces less than 25,000 barrels of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer may choose to apply, in writing, to the commissioner to be subject to the variable license fees of subdivision (3), subsection (b) of this section and the requirements set out in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section subject to investigation and approval by the commissioner as to brewer requirements.(5) For a brewpub, the license fee is $500 for each place of manufacture.(c) As part of the application or renewal application and in order to determine a brewer or resident brewer's license fee pursuant to this section, a brewer or resident brewer shall provide the commissioner, on a form provided by the commissioner, with an estimate of the number of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer barrels and gallons it may produce during the year based upon the production capacity of the brewer's or resident brewer's manufacturing facilities and the prior year's production and sales volume of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer.(d) On or before July 15 of each year, every brewer or resident brewer who is granted a license shall file a final report, on a form provided by the commissioner, that is dated as of June 30 of that year, stating the actual volume of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer in barrels and gallons produced at its principal place of business and other sites of manufacture during the prior year.(e) If the actual total production of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer by the brewer or resident brewer exceeded the brewer's or resident brewer's estimate that was filed with the application or renewal application for a brewer's or resident brewer's license for that period, then the brewer or resident brewer shall include a remittance for the balance of the license fee pursuant to this section that would be required for the final, higher level of production.  (f) Any brewer or resident brewer failing to file the reports required in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, and who is not exempt from the reporting requirements, shall, at the discretion of the commissioner, be subject to the penalties set forth in §11-16-23 of this code.(g) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the license fee per event for a nonintoxicating beer floor plan extension is free for up to six separate floor plan extension events per year, after reaching six events in a year, for any subsequent events the fee is $50 per every floor plan extension for the rest of the year, and the fee may not be prorated or refunded. A licensee shall submit an application, certification that the event meets certain requirements in this code and rules, and any other information required by the commissioner, at least 15 days prior to the event, all as determined by the commissioner.(h) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a Class A retail dealer, in good standing with the commissioner, may apply, on a form provided by the commissioner, to sell, serve, and furnish nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption in an outdoor dining area or outdoor street dining area, as authorized by any municipal government or county commission in the which the licensee operates. The Class A retail dealer shall submit to the municipal government or county commission, for approval, a revised floorplan and a request to sell and serve nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, subject to the commissioner's requirements, in an approved outdoor area. For private outdoor street dining, or private outdoor dining, the approved and bounded outdoor area need not be adjacent to the licensee's licensed premises, but in close proximity and under the licensee's control with right of ingress and egress. For purposes of this section, "close proximity" means an available area within 150 feet of the Class A retail dealer's licensed premises. A Class A retail dealer may operate a nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer outdoor dining or outdoor street dining in conjunction with a temporary private outdoor dining or temporary private outdoor street dining area set forth in §60-7-8d of this code and temporary private wine outdoor dining or temporary private wine outdoor street dining set forth in §60-8-32a of this code. (i) For purposes of this article, "nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer outdoor dining and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer outdoor street dining" includes dining areas that are: (1) Outside and not served by an HVAC system for air handling services and use outside air; (2) Open to the air; and(3) Not enclosed by fixed or temporary walls; however, the commissioner may seasonally approve a partial enclosure with up to three temporary or fixed walls. Any area where seating is incorporated inside a permanent building with ambient air through HVAC is not considered outdoor dining pursuant to this subsection. §11-16-11a. Nonintoxicating beer sampling. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee, Class A Retail Dealer, or Class B Retail Dealer may, with the written approval of the commissioner, conduct a nonintoxicating beer sampling event on a designated nonintoxicating beer sampling day.(b) At least five business days prior to the nonintoxicating beer sampling, the Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee, Class A Retail Dealer, or Class B Retail Dealer shall submit a written proposal to the commissioner requesting to hold a nonintoxicating beer sampling event, including:(1) The day of the event;(2) The location of the event;(3) The times for the event;(4) The names of up to three specific brands, types, and flavors, if any, of the nonintoxicating beer to be sampled; and(5) A statement indicating that all the nonintoxicating beer brands have been registered and approved for sale in the state by the commissioner.(c) Upon approval by the commissioner, a Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee, Class A Retail Dealer, or Class B Retail Dealer may serve the complimentary nonintoxicating beer samples of the approved brands, types, and flavors that are purchased by the a Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee, Class A Retail Dealer, or Class B Retail Dealer with all taxes paid, from its inventory.(d) The complimentary nonintoxicating beer sample on any nonintoxicating beer sampling day shall not exceed:(1) Three separate and individual sample servings per brand, type, and flavor per customer verified to be 21 years of age or older; and(2) Four ounces in total volume per brand, type, and flavor.(e) Servers at the nonintoxicating beer sampling event shall:(1) Be employees of the Class A retail licensee or Class B retail licensee;(2) Be at least 21 years of age or older; and(3) Have specific knowledge of the nonintoxicating beer being sampled to convey to the customer.(f) All servers at the nonintoxicating beer sampling event shall verify the age of the customer sampling nonintoxicating beer by requiring and reviewing proper forms of identification. Servers at the nonintoxicating beer event may not serve any person who is:(1) Under the age of 21 years; or(2) Intoxicated.(g) A nonintoxicating beer sampling event shall:(1) Occur only inside the Class A retail licensee's or Class B retail authorized licensee’s licensed premises; and(2) Cease on or before 9:00 p.m. on any approved nonintoxicating beer sampling day.(h) Any nonintoxicating beer bottle or can used for sampling must be from the inventory of the licensee, and clearly and conspicuously labeled "SAMPLE, NOT FOR RESALE". If the seal is broken on any nonintoxicating beer bottle or can, or if any nonintoxicating beer bottle or can is opened, then that nonintoxicating beer bottle or can must be removed from the licensed premises immediately following the event.(i) Violations of this section are subject to the civil and criminal penalties set forth in §11-16-18, §11-16-19, §11-16-20, §11-16-22, §11-16-23, §11-16-24, and §11-16-25 of this code.(j) To implement the provisions of this section, the commissioner may promulgate emergency rules pursuant to the provisions of §29a-3-1 of this code or propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29a -3-1 et seq. of this code. CHAPTER 17C. TRAFFIC REGULATIONS AND LAWS OF THE ROAD. ARTICLE 5D. OPEN CONTAINER LAWS. §17C-5D-3. Possession of an open alcoholic beverage container in the passenger area of a motor vehicle; exceptions; penalties. (a) It is unlawful for the operator or a passenger of a motor vehicle to consume any alcoholic beverage in the passenger area of a motor vehicle located on a public highway or right-of-way of a public highway in this state, whether the vehicle is in motion or at rest.(b) It is unlawful for the operator or a passenger of a motor vehicle to knowingly possess any open alcoholic beverage container in the passenger area of any motor vehicle that is located on a public highway or right-of-way of a public highway in this state, whether the vehicle is in motion or at rest. Possession by a person of one or more open containers in a single criminal occurrence is a single offense.(c) The provisions of this section are not applicable to a passenger:(1) In the passenger area of a motor vehicle designed, maintained or used primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation including, but not limited to, a bus, taxicab, pedal bike, chartered bus, or limousine; or(2) In the living quarters of a motorized or nonmotorized house coach, house trailer, motor home or self-contained camper.(d) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $50 nor more than $100. CHAPTER 60. STATE CONTROL OF ALCOHOLIC LIQUORS. ARTICLE 2. ALCOHOL BEVERAGE CONTROL COMMISSIONER. §60-2-17b. Wine and liquor operating fund established; operations fee; fund issues. (a) As of July 1, 2019, there is an annual nonrefundable and nonprorated operational fee of $100 for all distilleries, mini-distilleries, wineries, farm wineries, Class A retail licensees, Class B retail licensees, private clubs club types, private wine retailers, wine specialty shops, wine restaurants, private wine spas, private wine venues, bed and breakfasts, wine suppliers, and wine distributors which shall be paid on or before July 1, 2019, and every July 1 thereafter.  All fees collected by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a special revenue account in the State Treasury, hereby created, to be known as the Wine and Liquor Operations Fund.  Moneys in the fund may only be expended by the commissioner for the administration of this chapter, as appropriated by law.(b) Licensees holding multiple licenses for nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, or liquor shall be subject to paying only one operations fee of $100 under this chapter and under §11-16-10(d) of this code. ARTICLE 3A. SALES BY RETAIL LIQUOR LICENSEES. §60-3A-12. Annual retail license fee; expiration and renewal of retail licenses. (a) The annual retail license period is from July 1 to June 30 of the following year. The annual retail license fee for a Class A or Class B retail license is $2,000 $3,000. The annual retail license fee for the initial year of issuance shall be prorated based on the number of days remaining between the date of issuance and the following June 30. Notwithstanding the Class B off-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, a Class A or Class B retail  license includes the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for off-premises consumption and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such  Class B off-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code. Further, notwithstanding the Class B off-premises fees set forth in §60-8-1 et seq. of this code and §60-8A-1 et seq. of this code, a Class A or Class B retail license includes the sale of wine and hard cider for off-premises consumption and any other wine or hard cider services or privileges available to such Class B off-premises licenses as set forth in §60-8-1 et seq. and §60-8A-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §60-8-1 et seq. and §60-8A-1 et seq. of this code. (b) All retail licenses expire on June 30 of each year and may be renewed only upon the submission to the commissioner of the same information required for the issuance of the license and any additional information requested by the commissioner on the forms and by the date prescribed by the commissioner, together with the payment to the commissioner of the applicable annual retail license fee required under this section.(c) No person may sell liquor at any retail outlet if the retail license applicable to the outlet has been suspended or revoked, or has expired.(d) All retail licenses issued or renewed under the provisions of this article for the period ending June 30, 2010, or on June 30 for any ten-year period thereafter, expire and are of no further force or effect as of July 1, 2010, or as of July 1 every ten years thereafter.(e) Notwithstanding any provision of section eighteen, article four §60-4-18 of this chapter code to the contrary, a municipality may invoke the authority granted by section four, article thirteen, chapter eight §8-13-4 of this code to require an annual license from each retail licensee and require payment for the license in amounts not to exceed the amounts provided in subsection (a) of this section. §60-3A-17. Wholesale prices set by commissioner; retail licensees to purchase liquor from state; transportation and storage; method of payment. (a) The commissioner shall fix wholesale prices for the sale of liquor, other than wine, to retail licensees. The commissioner shall sell liquor, other than wine, to retail licensees according to a uniform pricing schedule. The commissioner shall obtain, if possible, upon request, any liquor requested by a retail licensee and those permitted to manufacture and sell liquor pursuant to §60-4-3 of this code.(b) Wholesale prices shall be established in order to yield a net profit for the General Revenue Fund of not less than $6,500,000 annually on an annual volume of business equal to the average for the past three years. The net revenue derived from the sale of alcoholic liquors shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund in the manner provided in §60-3-17 of this code.(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, the commissioner shall specify the maximum wholesale markup percentage which may be applied to the prices paid by the commissioner for all liquor, other than wine, in order to determine the prices at which all liquor, other than wine, will be sold to retail licensees. A retail licensee shall purchase all liquor, other than wine, for resale in this state only from the commissioner, and the provisions of §60-6-12 and §60-6-13 of this code shall not apply to the transportation of the liquor: Provided, That a retail licensee shall purchase wine from a wine distributor who is duly licensed under §60-8-1 et seq. of this code. All liquor, other than wine, purchased by retail licensees shall be stored in the state at the retail outlet or outlets operated by the retail licensee: Provided, however, That the commissioner, in his or her discretion, may upon written request permit a retail licensee to store liquor at a site other than the retail outlet or outlets.(d) The sale of liquor by the commissioner to retail licensees shall be paid by electronic funds transfer which shall be initiated by the commissioner on the business day following the retail licensees order or by money order, certified check, or cashier’s check which shall be received by the commissioner at least 24 hours prior to the shipping of the alcoholic liquors: Provided, That if a retail licensee posts with the commissioner an irrevocable letter of credit or bond with surety acceptable to the commissioner from a financial institution acceptable to the commissioner guaranteeing payment of checks, then the commissioner may accept the retail licensee’s checks in an amount up to the amount of the letter of credit.(e) (1) A retail licensee may not sell liquor to persons licensed under the provisions of §60-7-1 et seq. of this code at less than 115 percent of the retail licensee’s cost as defined in §47-11A-6 of this code. If a retail licensee can document, by purchase date and invoice submitted along with a written request to the commissioner, that a liquor product, which is still salable and fit for human consumption, has been stagnant for over one years from the purchase date, then, upon meeting the aforesaid requirements and approval by the commissioner, the retail licensee may not sell stagnant liquor to persons licensed under the provisions of §60-7-1 et seq. of this code at less than 85 percent of the retail licensee’s cost as defined in §47-11A-6 of this code.  (2) A retail licensee may not sell liquor to the general public at less than 110 percent of the retail licensee’s cost as defined in §47-11A-6 of this code. If a retail licensee can document, by purchase date and invoice submitted along with a written request to the commissioner, that a liquor product, which is still salable and fit for human consumption, has been stagnant for over one year from the purchase date, then, upon meeting the aforesaid requirements and approval by the commissioner, the retail licensee may not sell stagnant liquor to the general public at less than 90 percent of the retail licensee’s cost as defined in §47-11A-6 of this code. §60-3A-19. Limitation on amount to be sold. (a) Not more than ten 10 gallons of liquor may be sold by a retail licensee to a person at one time without the approval of the commissioner or his or her representative, but a sale in excess of ten 10 gallons may be made to a religious organization purchasing wine for sacramental purposes: Provided, That this section does not apply to purchases by private clubs club types as defined in article seven of this chapter §60-7-1 et seq. of this code. (b) This section does not apply to licensed distilleries, mini-distilleries, or micro-distilleries when selling an entire barrel or barrels of liquor, approved by commissioner, to a person or group of persons who have proof of their purchase while transporting more than 10 gallons of liquor purchased by the person or group of persons from the licensed distilleries, mini-distilleries, or micro-distilleries, subject to the provisions of §60-6-6 of this code. ARTICLE 4. LICENSES. §60-4-3a. Distillery, mini-distillery, and micro-distillery license to manufacture and sell. (a) Sales of liquor. — An operator of a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may offer liquor for retail sale to customers from the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery for consumption off-premises only. Except for samples offered pursuant to §60-6-1 of this code, customers may not consume any liquor on the premises of the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery, except for a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery that obtains a private venue – alcohol manufacturer club license set forth in §60-7-1 et seq. of this code, and a Class A retail dealer license set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of the code: Provided, That a licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may offer samples of alcoholic liquors as authorized by this subsection when alcoholic liquors are manufactured by that licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery for consumption on the licensed premises. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may sell, furnish, and serve alcoholic liquors when licensed accordingly beginning at 6:00 a.m. unless otherwise determined by the residents of the county pursuant to §7-1-3ss of this code.  (b) Retail on-premises and off-premises consumption sales. — Every licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall comply with the provisions of §60-3A-9, §60-3A-11, §60-3A-13, §60-3A-16, §60-3A-17, §60-3A-18, §60-3A-19, §60-3A-22, §60-3A-23, §60-3A-24, §60-3A-25, and §60-3A-26 of this code, and the provisions of §60-3-1 et seq., §60-4-1 et seq., and §60-7-1 et seq. of this code, applicable to liquor retailers and distillers. In the interest of promoting tourism throughout the state, every licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery manufacturing liquor in this state is authorized, with a limited off-site retail privilege at private fairs and festivals, for on-premises consumption sales served by the drink or glass, and off-premises consumption sales by the bottle of only the licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery's sealed liquor. At least five days prior to an approved private fair and festival, an authorized distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall provide a copy of a written agreement to sell only liquor manufactured by the licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery at the private fair and festival's licensed premises. If approved, an authorized distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may conduct on-premises and off-premises consumption sales of its liquor from a designated booth at the private fair and festival as set forth in §60-7-8a of this code. All authorized and approved distilleries, mini-distilleries, and micro-distilleries' off-premises consumption sales shall comply with all retail requirements in §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code, and specifically §60-3A-17 of this code with respect to all markups, taxes, and fees and also all retail requirements of §60-7-1 et seq. of this code when applicable. Additionally, every authorized distillery, mini-distillery, and micro-distillery may provide samples to patrons who are 21 years of age and older and who are not intoxicated. The liquor samples of the licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery's product on any sampling day shall not exceed six ounces in total volume. Samples may be mixed with each other or with non-alcoholic liquids as long as the total amount of the liquor sampled does not exceed six ounces.(c) Payment of taxes and fees. — The distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed retailers and meet applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rule of the commissioner, except for including payments of the wholesale markup percentage and the handling fee provided by rule of the commissioner: Provided, That all liquor for sale to customers from the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery for off-premises consumption is subject of a five percent wholesale markup fee and an 80 cents per case bailment fee to be paid to the commissioner: Provided, however, That liquor sold by the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall not be priced less than the price set by the commissioner pursuant §60-3A-17 of this code.(d) Payments to market zone retailers. — Each distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall submit to the commissioner two percent of the gross sales price of each retail liquor sale for the value of all sales at the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery each month. Any sales by a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery at a private fair and festival are treated as occurring on their licensed premises for purposes of this market zone calculation. This collection shall be distributed by the commissioner, at least quarterly, to each market zone retailer located in the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery's market zone, proportionate to each market zone retailer's annual gross prior years pretax value sales. The maximum amount of market zone payments that a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery shall submit to the commissioner is $15,000 per annum.(e) Limitations on licensees. — A distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may not produce more than 50,000 gallons per calendar year. The commissioner may issue more than one distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery license to a single person or entity and a person may hold both a distillery and a mini-distillery license. The owners of a licensed distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may operate a winery, farm winery, brewery, or as a resident brewer as otherwise specified in the code.(f) Building code and tax classification. — Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, the mere addition of a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery licensed under this article on a property does not change the nature or use of the property which otherwise qualifies as agricultural use for building code and property tax classification purposes.(g) A political subdivision of this state may not regulate any of the following activities of a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery licensed and operating in accordance with this section:(1) The on-premises sale, tasting, or consumption of liquor during business hours set forth in §60-7-12 of this code;(2) The storage, warehousing, and wholesaling of liquor in accordance with the rules of the commissioner and federal law or regulations; or(3) The sale of liquor related items including, but not limited to, the sale of pre-packaged food not requiring kitchen preparation that are incidental to the sale of liquor and on-premises consumption.(h) Beginning on July 1, 2030, a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery licensed under this article may self-distribute, including lawful sales subject to all taxes, markups, market zone payments, and fees, to licensed private venues under §60-7-1 et seq. of this code within the market zone or contiguous market zone where the distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery is located. Distribution and sales are treated as occurring on a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery licensed premises for purposes of the market zone calculation If a market zone is locked out from sales due to its location, the commissioner may approve a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery who requests to jump market zones to conduct sales and distribute to a licensed private venue in such a market zone. §60-4-3b. Winery and farm winery license to manufacture and sell. (a) An operator of a winery or farm winery may offer wine produced by the winery, farm winery, or a farm entity authorized by §60-1-5c of this code, for retail sale to customers from the winery or farm winery for consumption on-premises or off-premises. Customers may consume wine on-premises by the glass or drink or by the bottle when consumed by the glass when an operator of a winery or farm winery offers samples pursuant to this section and §60-6-1 of this code, and when the winery or farm winery is licensed as a private wine restaurant venue, or the winery or farm winery is licensed as a private venue – alcohol manufacturer. club. Customers may not consume any wine on the licensed premises of the winery, farm winery, or a farm entity authorized by §60-1-5c of this code, unless the winery, farm winery, or farm entity has obtained a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license: Provided, That under this subsection, a licensed winery or farm winery may offer samples of wine manufactured by that licensed winery or farm winery for consumption on-premises during the hours of operation set forth in §60-8-34 of this code. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed winery or farm winery may sell, serve, and furnish wine, for on-premises consumption when licensed accordingly during the hours of operation set forth in §60-8-34 of this code unless otherwise determined by the residents of the county pursuant to §7-1-3ss of this code.(b) Restriction by a political subdivision upon activities and events of farm wineries licensed in accordance with §60-4-3b of the code, to market and sell their products shall be reasonable and shall take into account the economic impact on the farm winery of such restriction, the agricultural nature of such activities and events, and whether such activities and events are usual and customary for farm wineries throughout the state of West Virginia and adjacent states. Usual and customary activities and events at farm wineries shall be permitted without local regulation unless there is a substantial impact on the health, safety, or welfare of the public. No local ordinance regulating noise, other than outdoor amplified music, arising from activities and events at farm wineries shall be more restrictive than that in the general noise ordinance. In authorizing outdoor amplified music at a farm winery, the political subdivision shall consider the effect on adjacent property owners and nearby residents.(c) A political subdivision may not regulate any of the following activities of a farm winery licensed and operating in accordance with this section:(1) The production and harvesting of fruit and other agricultural products and the manufacturing of wine;(2) The on-premises sale, tasting, or consumption of wine during business hours set forth in §60-8-34 of this code; (3) The direct sale and shipment of wine by common carrier to consumers in accordance with the requirements of §60-8-6 and §60-8-6a of this code and the rules of the West Virginia Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner;(4) The storage, warehousing, and wholesaling of wine in accordance with the rules of the West Virginia and federal law or regulations; or(5) The sale of wine-related items, including, but not limited, to the sale of pre-packaged food not requiring kitchen preparation, that are incidental to the sale of wine and on-premises consumption.(6) To serve and sell wine by the glass or drink and by the bottle when consumed by the glass for consumption on- premises consumption, without the requirement to serve prepared food with the wine or application of any local health department limitations for food service in the area in which the wine is served.(d) No political subdivision may treat private personal gatherings held by the owner of a licensed farm winery who resides at the farm winery or on property adjacent thereto that is owned or controlled by such owner at which gatherings wine is not sold or marketed and for which no consideration is received by the farm winery or its agents differently from private personal gatherings by other citizens.(e) Samples allowed by the provisions of this section may not exceed three fluid ounces and no more than six samples may be given to a patron in any one day.(f) Samples may be provided only for on-premises consumption.(g) A winery, farm winery, or farm entity, pursuant to §60-1-5c of this code, may offer for retail sale from its licensed premises sealed original container bottles of wine for off-premises consumption.(h) A winery, farm winery, or farm entity licensed pursuant to §60-1-5c of this code, holding a multi-capacity license and a private wine restaurant license or private manufacturer club license may offer for sale wine by the drink or glass  or wine by the bottle when consumed by the glass on the property of the winery, farm winery, or farm entity licensed pursuant to §60-1-5c of this code.(i) Every licensed winery or farm winery shall comply with the provisions of §60-3-1 et seq., §60-4-1 et seq., and §60-8-1 et seq. of this code as applicable to wine retailers, wineries, and suppliers when properly licensed in such capacities.(j) (1) The winery or farm winery shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed wine retailers and meet applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rules promulgated by the commissioner. (2) Each winery or farm winery acting as its own supplier shall submit to the Tax Commissioner the liter tax for all sales at the winery or farm winery each month, as provided in §60-8-1 et seq. of this code.(3) The five percent wine excise tax, levied pursuant to §60-3-9d of this code, or pursuant to §8-13-7 of this code, may not be imposed or collected on purchases of wine in the original sealed package for the purpose of resale in the original sealed package, if the final purchase of the wine is subject to the excise tax or if the purchase is delivered outside this state.(4) A liter tax shall not be collected on wine sold in the original sealed package for the purpose of resale in the original sealed package if a subsequent sale of the wine is subject to the liter tax. (5) This section shall not be interpreted to authorize a purchase for resale exemption in contravention of §11-15-9a of this code.(k) A winery or farm winery may advertise a particular brand or brands of wine produced by it. The price of the wine is subject to federal requirements or restrictions.(l) A winery or farm winery shall maintain separate winery or farm winery supplier, retailer, and direct shipper licenses when acting in one or more of those capacities and shall pay all associated license fees, unless the winery or farm winery holds a license issued pursuant to the provisions of §60-8-3(b)(12) of this code. A winery or farm winery, if holding the appropriate licenses or a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license, may act as its own supplier; retailer for off-premises consumption of its wine as specified in §60-6-2 of this code; private wine restaurant venue; or direct shipper for wine produced by the winery or farm winery. A winery or farm winery that has applied, paid all fees, and met all requirements may obtain a private venue -alcohol manufacturer club license subject to the requirements of §60-7-1 et seq. of this code, and a Class A retail dealer license subject to the requirements of §11-16-1 et seq. of this code. All wineries shall use a distributor to distribute and sell their wine in the state, except for farm wineries. Wineries or farm wineries may enter into alternating wine proprietorship agreements, pursuant to §60-1-5c of this code.(m) The owners of a licensed winery or farm winery may operate a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery, brewery, or as a resident brewer, as otherwise specified in the code.(n) For purposes of this section, terms have the same meaning as provided in §8-13-7 of this code.(o) Building code and tax classification. — Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, the mere addition of a winery or farm winery licensed under this article on a property does not change the nature or use of the property which otherwise qualifies as agricultural use for building code and property tax classification purposes.(p) In the interest of promoting tourism throughout the state, every licensed winery or farm winery manufacturing wine in this state is authorized, with a limited off-site retail privilege at private fairs and festivals, for on-premises consumption sales and off-premises consumption sales of only the winery or farm winery's wine. At least five days prior to an approved private fair and festival, an authorized winery or farm winery shall provide a copy of a written agreement to sell only wine manufactured by the licensed winery or farm winery at the private fair and festival's licensed premises. If approved, an authorized licensed winery or farm winery may conduct on-premises and off-premises consumption sales of its wine from a designated booth at the private fair and festival as set forth in §60-7-8a of this code. All authorized and approved wineries and farm wineries' on-premises and off-premises consumption sales shall comply with all retail requirements in §60-8-1 et seq. of this code, and specifically with respect to all markups, taxes, and fees. Additionally, an authorized winery, farm winery, or unlicensed winery, as referenced in §60-8-3 of this code may provide, sell, and serve  wine samples of its wine in the amounts set forth in subsection (b) of this section, wine by the glass or drink, or wine by the bottle, when consumed by the glass, for on-premises consumption to patrons who are 21 years of age and older and who are not intoxicated. (q) Farm Wineries. – A farm winery is permitted to serve and sell wine as authorized by this section without the requirement to serve prepared food or the application of any local health department requirements for food service. Prior to the sale, the licensee shall verify, using proper identification, that any patron purchasing wine is 21 years of age or over and that the patron is not visibly intoxicated.(r) All Farm Wineries may serve and sell wine at any fair or festival in the state of West Virginia consistent with the requirements of §60-8-3 and §60-8-8 of this code. ARTICLE 7. LICENSES TO PRIVATE CLUBS. §60-7-2. Definitions; authorizations; requirements for certain private club and private club type licenses. (a) Unless the context in which used clearly requires a different meaning, as used in this article:(1) "Applicant" means a private club applying for a license under the provisions of this article.(2) "Code" means the official Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended.(3) "Commissioner" means the West Virginia Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner.(4) "Licensee" means the holder of a license to operate a private club granted under this article, which remains unexpired, unsuspended, and unrevoked.(5) "Private club" means any corporation or unincorporated association which either: (A) Belongs to or is affiliated with a nationally recognized fraternal or veterans' organization which is operated exclusively for the benefit of its members, which pays no part of its income to its shareholders or individual members, which owns or leases a building or other premises to which are admitted only duly-elected or approved dues-paying members in good standing of the corporation or association and their guests while in the company of a member and to which club the general public is not admitted, and which maintains in the building or on the premises a suitable kitchen and dining facility with related equipment for serving food to members and their guests; (B) Is a nonprofit social club, which is operated exclusively for the benefit of its members, which pays no part of its income to its shareholders or individual members, which owns or leases a building or other premises to which are admitted only duly-elected or approved dues-paying members in good standing of the corporation or association and their guests while in the company of a member and to which club the general public is not admitted, and which maintains in the building or on the premises a suitable kitchen and dining facility with related equipment for serving food to members and their guests; (C) Is organized and operated for legitimate purposes, which has at least 100 duly- elected or approved dues-paying members in good standing, which owns or leases a building or other premises, including any vessel licensed or approved by any federal agency to carry or accommodate passengers on navigable waters of this state, to which are admitted only duly- elected or approved dues-paying members in good standing of the corporation or association and their guests while in the company of a member and to which the general public is not admitted, and which club maintains in the building or on the premises a suitable kitchen and dining facility with related equipment and employs a sufficient number of persons for serving meals to members and their guests; or(D) Is organized for legitimate purposes and owns or leases a building or other delimited premises in any state, county, or municipal park, or at any airport, in which a club has been established, to which are admitted only duly-elected and approved dues-paying members in good standing and their guests while in the company of a member and to which the general public is not admitted, and which maintains in connection with the club a suitable kitchen and dining facility and related equipment and employs a sufficient number of persons for serving meals in the club to the members and their guests. (E) Additional private club types include: a private accommodation, private venue, and private sports venue.(6) "Private Accommodation" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that operates as a hotel, bed and breakfast, short term rental, or resort hotel meeting the criteria set forth in this subsection for a:(A) Hotel, short-term rental, or bed and breakfast that:(i) Offers short-term, daily rate accommodations or lodging for members and their guests amounting to at least five separate bedrooms, offers a conference center or room for meetings, as determined by the commissioner, and may offer one to two separate areas for the sale and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer;(ii) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, walk-in freezers, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 20 hours per week;(iii) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private hotel's full kitchen;(iv) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least one acre, and such property that is bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for hotel and conferences and large contracted group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and recreational events;(v) Lists the entire property from subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the hotel's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the hotel's licensed premises and as noted on the hotel's floorplan;(vi) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (vii) May provide members and guests who are verified by proper form of identification to be 21 years of age or older to have secure access via key or key card to an in-room mini-bar in their rented short-term accommodation; the mini-bar may be a small refrigerator not in excess of 1.6 cubic feet for the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, hard cider, and liquor sold from the original sealed container, and the refrigerator may contain: (I) Any combination of 12 fluid ounce cans or bottles not exceeding 72 fluid ounces of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (II) Any combination of cans or bottles of wine or hard cider not exceeding 750 ml of wine or hard cider; (III) Liquor in bottles sized from 50 ml, 100 ml, and 200 ml, with any combination of those liquor bottles not exceeding 750 ml; and (IV) Any combination of canned or packaged food. All markups, fees, and taxes must be charged on the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, liquor, and hard cider. All nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer available for sale must be purchased from the licensed distributor in the area where licensed. All wine or hard cider available for sale must be purchased from a licensed wine distributor or authorized farm winery. All liquor available for sale must be purchased from the licensed retail liquor outlet in the market zone of the licensed premises. The mini-bar must be checked daily and replenished as needed to benefit the member and guest. (B) Resort hotel that: (i) Offers short term, daily rate accommodations or lodging for members and their guests amounting to at least 50 separate bedrooms and may offer multiple areas from two to 20 separate areas, upon written request additional areas may be granted, for the sale and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer, depending on its licensure status;(ii) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, six-burner ranges, walk-in freezers, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 25 hours per week;(iii) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the resort hotel's full kitchen;(iv) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 10 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for destination, resort, and large contracted-for group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and recreational events;(v) Lists the entire property from subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the resort hotel's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the resort hotel's licensed premises;(vi) May have a separately licensed resident brewer with a brewpub license inner-connected via a walkway, doorway, or entryway, all as determined and approved by the commissioner, for limited access during permitted hours of operation for tours and samples at the resident brewery; and(vii) May provide members and guests who are verified by proper form of identification to be 21 years of age or older to have access via key or key card to an in-room mini-bar in their rented short-term accommodation. The mini-bar may be a small refrigerator not in excess of 3.2 cubic feet for the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, hard cider, and liquor sold from the original sealed container, and the refrigerator may contain: (I) Any combination of 12 fluid ounce cans or bottles not exceeding 144 fluid ounces of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (II) Any combination of cans or bottles of wine or hard cider not exceeding one and a half liters of wine or hard cider; (III) Liquor in bottles sized from 50 ml, 100 ml, 200 ml, and 375 ml with any combination of such liquor bottles not exceeding one and a half liters; and (IV) Any combination of canned or packaged food. All markups, fees, and taxes must be charged on the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, hard cider, wine, and liquor. All nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer available for sale must be purchased from the licensed distributor in the area where licensed. All wine or hard cider available for sale must be purchased from a licensed wine distributor or authorized farm winery. All liquor available for sale shall be purchased from the licensed retail liquor outlet in the market zone of the licensed premises. The mini-bar must be checked daily and replenished as needed to benefit the member and guest.(7) "Private Sports Venue" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that operates as golf club, golf course, tennis club, sports stadium whether college or professional sports, a multi-sport complex, a coliseum or center, or any other sports center, as determined by the commissioner, where certain sports are played or watched and other events occur, which operate as: (A) A golf club or course that: (i) Has at least one nine-hole golf course with at least nine separate and distinct golf playing holes or mini-golf playing holes;(ii) Has a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week;(iii) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 30 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the golf club or course's floorplan and could be used for golfing events and large contracted group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, sporting, or recreational events;(iv) Lists the entire property from subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the golf club or course’s floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer, wine, hard cider, or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities are conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the golf club's or course’s licensed premises; (v) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property, buildings, and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (B) A tennis club or other racket sports facility that:(i) Has at least four separate and distinct tennis courts, either indoor or outdoor, and a clubhouse or similar facility;(ii) Has a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food;(iii) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the tennis club's floorplan and could be used for tennis or racket sports events and large events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, tournaments, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(iv) Lists the entire property from subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private tennis club's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the tennis club's or sport facility’s licensed premises;(v) Identifies a person, persons, an entity, or entities who or which has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (C) A college sports stadium on the campus of a college or university and may be stadium or coliseum for Division I, II, or III sports and that involves a college, public or private, or university that is a member of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, its successor, or other ratifying body, and uses the facility for football, basketball, baseball, soccer, or other Division I, II, or III sports, reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours as a bar or restaurant. The licensee may sell alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer when conducting or temporarily hosting non-collegiate or collegiate sporting events. This license may be issued in the name of the National Collegiate Athletic Association Division I, II, or III college or university or the name of the primary food and beverage vendor under contract with that college or university. All alcohol sales shall take place within the confines of the college or university stadium: Provided, That any outside area approved for alcohol sales and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer must be surrounded by a fence or other barrier prohibiting entry except upon the college or university's express permission, and under the conditions and restrictions established by the college or university, so that the alcohol sales area is closed in order to prevent entry and access by the general public. Further the applicant shall:(i) Maintain an open-air or enclosed stadium or coliseum venue primarily used for sporting events, such as football, basketball, baseball, soccer, or other Division I, II, or III sports, and also weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties shall reserve the college stadium venue in advance of the event;  (ii) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens and equipment that is equivalent or greater than a private venue restaurant, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises that is capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the college sports stadium;(iii) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the college stadium's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for temporary non-collegiate sporting events, group-type weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(iv) List the entire property from subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the college sports stadium's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the college sports stadium's licensed premises and as noted on the college sports stadium's floorplan; and(v) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (D) A professional sports stadium that is only open for professional sporting events when the events are affiliated with or sponsored by a professional sporting association, reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours as a bar or restaurant. Further an applicant shall:(i) Maintain an open-air or enclosed stadium venue primarily used for sporting events, such as football, baseball, soccer, auto racing, or other professional sports, and also weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve the stadium venue in advance of the event;  (ii) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to serve its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the stadium;(iii) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least three contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the professional sports stadium's floorplan and could be used for contracted- for professional sporting events, group-type weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(iv) List the entire property from subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the stadium's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the stadium's licensed premises; and(v) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (E) A multi-sport complex that is open for multiple sports events to be played simultaneously at the complex’s multiple sports facilities, reserved weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events, and which:(i) Maintains an open-air multi-sport complex primarily for use for sporting events, such as baseball, soccer, basketball, tennis, frisbee, or other sports, but may also conduct weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve parts of the sports complex in advance of the sporting or other event; (ii) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens in the licensee's main facility, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food, or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the multi-sport complex. A licensee may contract with temporary food vendors or food trucks for food sales only, but not on a permanent basis, in areas of the multi-sport complex not readily accessible by the main facility; (iii) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the multi-sport complex's full kitchen;(iv) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 50 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the multi-sport complex's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for sporting events, group-type weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(v) Lists the entire property from subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the multi-sport complex's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, and hard cider throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the multi-sport complex's licensed premises, as noted on the multi-sport complex's floorplan. The licensee may sell alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer from a golf cart or food truck owned or leased by the licensee and also operated by the licensee when the golf cart or food truck is located on the multi-sport complex's licensed premises; and(vi) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (F) A coliseum or center that is open for various events including, but not limited to, musical concerts, bands, sporting events, monster trucks, combat sports, wrestling sports entertainment events, circuses, expos, hobby events, tradeshows, health events, reserved weddings, reunions, retreats, conventions, conferences, meetings, or other special events. The applicant shall also:(i) Maintain an enclosed coliseum or center venue with at least 50,000 square feet of event space primarily used for events where parties reserve the coliseum or center venue in advance of the event;  (ii) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises and be capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending events at the coliseum or center;(iii) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the coliseum or center's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for events, or a private fair and festival, as authorized by the commissioner per dual licensing requirements as set forth in §60-7-2a of this code;(iv) List the entire property from subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and all adjoining buildings and structures on the coliseum or center's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on coliseum or center's licensed premises; and(v) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (8) "Private Venue" means an applicant for a private club or a licensed private club that functions primarily as a bar, restaurant, wedding venue or barn, food truck, bakery, an alcohol manufacturer’s bar or restaurant, a farmer’s market, food court, restaurants that cater food and alcohol, or other establishments meeting the requirements set forth in this section for licensure, as determined by the commissioner, and operate as: (A) A bakery that is a business "Private bakery" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club license that has a primary function of operating a food preparation business that produces baked goods, including brownies, cookies, cupcakes, confections, muffins, breads, cakes, wedding cakes, and other baked goods where the applicant or licensee desires to sell baked goods infused with liquor, wine, or nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, included: (A) such as In the icing, syrup, drizzle, or some other topping; (B), as an infusion where the alcohol is not processed or cooked out of the baked goods;, or (C)  from an infusion packet containing alcohol no greater than 10 milliliters where the purchaser adds the alcohol. The applicant or licensee may not sell liquor, wine, or nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises or off-premises consumption. The applicant or licensee may sell the baked goods with alcohol added as authorized for on-premises and off-premises consumption. Further, the applicant or licensee shall: (i) Have at least 50 members;(ii) (i) Operate a kitchen that produces baked goods, as specified in this subdivision, including at least: (I) A baking oven and a four-burner range or hot plate; (II) A sink with hot and cold running water; (III) A 17 cubic foot refrigerator or freezer, or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer which is not used for alcohol cold storage; (IV) Baking utensils and pans, kitchen utensils, and other food consumption apparatus as determined by the commissioner; and (V) Food fit for human consumption available to be served during all hours of operation on the licensed premises; (iii) (ii) Maintain, at any one time, a food inventory capable of being prepared in the private bakery's kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner shall include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable food or meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, baking items such as flour, sugar, icing, and other confectionary items, or canned prepared foods; (iv) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under the age of 21 who are in the private bakery are not sold items containing alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, or wine. A person under 21 years of age may enter the shop and purchase other items not containing alcoholic liquors; and(v) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements. "Private cigar shop" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that has a primary function of operating a cigar shop for sales of premium cigars for consumption on or off the licensed premises. Where permitted by law, indoor on-premises cigar consumption is permitted with a limited food menu, which may be met by using a private caterer, for members and guests while the private club applicant or licensee is selling and serving liquor, wine, or nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption. Further, the applicant or licensee shall: (A) Have at least 50 members;(B) Operate a cigar shop and bar with a kitchen, including at least: (i) A two-burner hot plate, air fryer, or microwave oven; (ii) a sink with hot and cold running water; (iii) a 17 cubic foot refrigerator or freezer, or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer which is not used for alcohol cold storage; (iv) kitchen utensils and other food consumption apparatus as determined by the commissioner; and (v) food fit for human consumption available to be served during all hours of operation on the licensed premises; (C) Maintain, at any one time, not less than a food inventory capable of being prepared in the private club bar's kitchen or have on hand at least $150 in food provided by a private caterer. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner shall include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable food or meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, or canned prepared foods; (D) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under the age of 21 who are in the private club bar are accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, and if a person under 21 years of age is not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, refuse to admit that person as a guest; and(E) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements."Private caterer" means a licensed private club restaurant, private hotel, or private resort hotel authorized by the commissioner to cater and serve food and sell and serve alcoholic liquors, or non-intoxicating beer or non-intoxicating craft beer. A private caterer shall purchase wine sold or served at a catering event from a wine distributor. A private caterer shall purchase nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer sold or served at the catering event from a licensed beer distributor. A private caterer shall purchase liquor from a retail liquor outlet authorized to sell in the market zone, where the catering event is held. The private caterer or the persons or entity holding the catering event shall:(A) Have at least 10 members and guests attending the catering event; (B) Have obtained an open container waiver or have otherwise been approved by a municipality or county in which the event is being held;(C) Operate a private club restaurant on a daily operating basis;(D) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to sell and serve alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer who have received certified training in verifying the legal identification, the age of a purchasing person, and the signs of visible, noticeable, and physical intoxication;(E) Provide to the commissioner, at least seven days before the event is to take place:(i) The name and business address of the unlicensed private venue where the private caterer is to provide food and alcohol for a catering event;(ii) The name of the owner or operator of the unlicensed private venue;(iii) A copy of the contract or contracts between the private caterer, the person contracting with the caterer, and the unlicensed private venue;(iv) A floorplan of the unlicensed private venue to comprise the private catering premises, which shall only include spaces in buildings or rooms of an unlicensed private venue where the private caterer has control of the space for a set time period and where the space safely accounts for the ingress and egress of the stated members and guests who will be attending the private catering event at the catering premises. The unlicensed private venue's floorplan during the set time period as stated in the contract shall comprise the private caterer's licensed premises, which is authorized for the lawful sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer, and wine throughout the licensed private catering premises: Provided, That the unlicensed private venue shall: (I) Be inside a building or structure; (II) have other facilities to prepare and serve food and alcohol; (III) have adequate restrooms and sufficient building facilities for the number of members and guests expected to attend the private catering event; and  (IV) otherwise be in compliance with health, fire, safety, and zoning requirements;(F) Not hold more than 15 private catering events per calendar year. Upon reaching the 16th event, the unlicensed venue shall obtain its own private club license;(G) Submit to the commissioner, evidence that any noncontiguous area of an unlicensed venue is within 150 feet of the private caterer's submitted floorplan and may submit a floorplan extension for authorization to permit alcohol and food at an outdoor event;(H) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements; and(I) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner. (B) A bar "Private club bar" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that has that is a business with a primary function for the use of the licensed premises as a bar for the sale and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer and wine when licensed for those sales, while providing a limited food menu for members and guests, and meeting the criteria set forth in this subdivision which:(A) Has at least 100 members;(B) (i) Operates a bar with a kitchen, including at least: (i) (I) A two-burner hot plate, air fryer, or microwave oven; (ii) a (II) A sink with hot and cold running water; (iii) a (III) A 17 cubic foot refrigerator or freezer, or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer which is not used for alcohol cold storage; (iv) kitchen (IV) Kitchen utensils and other food consumption apparatus as determined by the commissioner; and (v) food (V) Food fit for human consumption available to be served during all hours of operation on the licensed premises; and(C) (ii) Maintains, at any one time, a food inventory capable of being prepared in the private club bar's kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner shall include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable food or meals, frozen meals, prepackaged foods, or canned prepared foods; (D) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under the age of 18 who are in the private club bar are accompanied by a parent or legal guardian. If a person under 18 years of age is not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian that person may not be admitted as a guest; and(E) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements.(C) A restaurant that is a business with a primary function of using the licensed premises as a restaurant for serving freshly prepared meals and dining in the restaurant area. The restaurant may have a bar area separate from or commingled within the restaurant where seating requirements for members and guests are met by including the restaurant area. The applicant must: (i) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen, with ovens and four-burner ranges, with refrigerators or freezers, or some combination of refrigerators and freezers greater than 50 cubic feet, or a walk-in refrigerator or freezer, with other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner, and with freshly prepared food fit for human consumption available to be served during all hours of operation on the licensed premises; (ii) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under 18 years of age who are in the bar area of the restaurant are accompanied by a parent or legal guardian. The licensee may not seat a person in the bar area who is under the age of 18 years who is not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, but may allow that person, as a guest, to dine for food and nonalcoholic beverage purposes in the restaurant dining area; (iii) If permitting members and guests to carry on to its licensed premises up to two bottles of wine that a member purchased from a wine retailer, winery, or farm winery when licensed for retail sales, or a licensed wine direct shipper when the purchase is for personal use and not for resale, to charge a corkage fee. The licensee may charge a corkage fee of up to $10 dollars per bottle. In no event may a member or a group of members and guests exceed two sealed bottles or containers of wine to carry onto the licensed premises for uncorking and serving by the restaurant and for personal consumption by the member and guests. A member or guest may cork and reseal any unconsumed wine bottles as provided in §60-8-3(j) of this code and the legislative rules for carrying unconsumed wine off the licensed premises; (iv) Have at least two restrooms for members and their guests: Provided, That this requirement may be waived by the local health department upon supplying a written waiver of the requirement to the commissioner: Provided, however, That the requirement may also be waived for a historic building by written waiver supplied to commissioner of the requirement from the historic association or district with jurisdiction over a historic building: Provided further, That in no event may a restaurant have less than one restroom; and (v) If a restaurant has been approved by the commissioner to cater and serve food and cater, sell, and serve alcoholic liquors, non-intoxicating beer or non-intoxicating craft beer must purchase: wine sold or served at a catering event from a wine distributor; nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer sold or served at the catering event from a licensed beer distributor,  liquor from a retail liquor outlet authorized to sell in the market zone, where the catering event is held. A private venue - restaurant approved to cater or the persons or entity holding the catering event shall: (I) Obtain an open container waiver or have otherwise been approved by a municipality or county in which the catering event is being held;(II) Operate a private venue - restaurant on a daily operating basis;(III) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to sell and serve alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer who have received certified training in verifying the legal identification, the age of a purchasing person, and the signs of visible, noticeable, and physical intoxication;(IV) Provide to the commissioner, at least seven days before the event is to take place the following:(aa) The name and business address of the unlicensed private venue where the private venue caterer is to provide food and alcohol for a catering event;(bb) The name of the owner or operator of the unlicensed private venue;(cc) A copy of the contract or contracts between the approved private venue - restaurant catering the event, the person contracting with the restaurant approved for catering, and the unlicensed private venue;(dd) A floorplan of the unlicensed private venue to comprise the catering premises, which shall only include spaces in buildings or rooms of an unlicensed private venue where the caterer has control of the space for a set time period and where the space safely accounts for the ingress and egress of the stated members and guests who will be attending the catering event at the approved catering premises. The unlicensed private venue's floorplan during the set time period as stated in the contract shall comprise the caterer's licensed premises, which is authorized for the lawful sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer, and wine throughout the licensed catering premises: Provided, That the unlicensed private venue shall be inside a building or structure; have other facilities to prepare and serve food and alcohol; have adequate restrooms and sufficient building facilities for the number of members and guests expected to attend the catering event; and otherwise be in compliance with health, fire, safety, and zoning requirements;(V) Not hold more than 15 catering events per calendar year at a single unlicensed private venue. Upon reaching the 16th event, the unlicensed private venue shall obtain its own permanent license; and(VI) Submit to the commissioner, evidence that any noncontiguous area of an unlicensed private venue is within 150 feet of the caterer's submitted floorplan and may submit a floorplan extension for authorization to permit alcohol and food at an outdoor event;(D) A wedding venue or barn that is a business only open for reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours, and which: (i) Maintains a venue, facility, barn, or pavilion primarily used for weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve or contract for the venue, facility, barn, or pavilion in advance of the event; (ii) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises that is capable of serving freshly prepared food, or engages a food caterer to provide adequate freshly prepared food or meals to serve its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the private wedding venue or barn. The applicant or licensee shall provide written documentation including a list of food caterers or written agreements regarding any food catering operations to the commissioner prior to approval of a food catering event; (iii) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses space sufficient to safely operate the licensed premises. The applicant or licensee shall verify that the property is bounded and fenced, subject to the commissioner's approval. The bounded or fenced real property may be listed on the wedding venue's or barn’s floorplan and may be used for large events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events; and (iv) Lists the entire property and all adjoining buildings and structures on the wedding venue or barn's floorplan that would comprise the licensed premises and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the wedding venue or barn's licensed premises;(E) "Private food truck" means an applicant for a private club, licensed private club licensee, or licensed private manufacturer's club licensee that has A "food truck" that is a business with a primary function of operating a food preparation business using an industrial truck, van, or trailer to prepare food and meals for sale at various locations within the state while using a propane, or electric, or other generator powered kitchen. The private food truck applicant shall obtain county or municipal approval to operate a private food truck for food and liquor, wine, hard cider, and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer sales and service, while providing a food menu for members and guests. The private food truck applicant shall: (A)  Have at least 10 members;(B) (i) Operate with a kitchen, including at least: (i) (I) A two-burner hot plate, air fryer, or microwave oven; (ii) a (II) A sink with hot and cold running water; (iii) at (III) At least a 10 cubic foot refrigerator or freezer, or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer which is not used for alcohol cold storage; and (iv) plastic (IV) Plastic or metal kitchen utensils and other food consumption apparatus as determined by the commissioner; (C) (ii) Maintain at any one time, not less than $200 of food inventory that is fit for human consumption and capable of being prepared and served from the private food truck's kitchen during all hours of operation; (D) (iii) Be sponsored, endorsed, or approved by the governing body or its designee of the county or municipality in which the private food truck is to be located and operated. Each location shall have a bounded and defined area and set hours for private food truck operations, sales, and consumption of alcohol that are not greater than a private club's club type’s hours of operation; (E) (iv) Provide the commissioner with a list of all locations, including a main business location, where the private food truck operates, and is approved for sales pursuant to paragraph (D) of this section subsection, and immediately update the commissioner when new locations are approved by a county or municipality; (F) (v) Require all nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer sold, furnished, tendered, or served pursuant to the license created by this section to be purchased from the licensed distributor where the private food truck has its home location or from a resident brewer acting in a limited capacity as a distributor, all in accordance with §11-16-1 et seq. of this code; (G) (vi) Require wine or hard cider sold, furnished, tendered, or served pursuant to the license created by this section to be purchased from a licensed distributor, winery, or farm winery in accordance with §60-8-1 et seq. of this code;(H) (vii) Require liquor sold, furnished, tendered, or served pursuant to the license created by this section shall be purchased from a licensed retail liquor outlet in the market zone or contiguous market zone where the private food truck has its main business location, all in accordance with §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code; (I) (viii) A licensee authorized by this section shall use bona fide employees to sell, furnish, tender, or serve the nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, or liquor;(J) (ix) A brewer, resident brewer, winery, farm winery, distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery may obtain a private venue food truck license;(K) (x) Licensed representatives of a brewer, resident brewer, beer distributor, wine distributor, wine supplier, winery, farm winery, distillery, mini-distillery, micro-distillery, and liquor broker representatives may attend a location where a private food truck is located and discuss their respective products but may not engage in the selling, furnishing, tendering, or serving of any nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, or liquor; (L) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under the age of 21 who are in the private club bar are not permitted to be served any alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, or wine but may be permitted to purchase food or other items; and(M) (xi) Obtain all permits required by §60-6-12 of this code. and(N) Meet and be subject to all other applicable private club requirements."Private club restaurant" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that has a primary function of using the licensed premises as a restaurant for serving freshly prepared meals and dining in the restaurant area. The private club restaurant may have a bar area separate from or commingled within the restaurant where seating requirements for members and guests are met by including the restaurant area. The applicant for a private club restaurant license is an applicant which: (A) Has at least 100 members;(B) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with at least: (i) Ovens and four-burner ranges; (ii) refrigerators or freezers, or some combination of refrigerators and freezers greater than 50 cubic feet, or a walk-in refrigerator or freezer; (iii) other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner; and (iv) freshly prepared food fit for human consumption available to be served during all hours of operation on the licensed premises;(C) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private club restaurant's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may not include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, or canned prepared foods;(D) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying that persons under 18 years of age who are in the bar area of a private club restaurant are accompanied by a parent or legal guardian. The licensee may not seat a person in the bar area who is under the age of 18 years who is not accompanied by a parent or legal guardian, but may allow that person, as a guest, to dine for food and nonalcoholic beverage purposes in the restaurant area of a private club restaurant:(E) May uncork and serve members and guests up to two bottles of wine that a member purchased from a wine retailer, wine specialty shop, an applicable winery or farm winery when licensed for retail sales, or a licensed wine direct shipper when the purchase is for personal use and, not for resale. The licensee may charge a corkage fee of up to $10 dollars per bottle. In no event may a member or a group of members and guests exceed two sealed bottles or containers of wine to carry onto the licensed premises for uncorking and serving by the private club restaurant and for personal consumption by the member and guests. A member or guest may cork and reseal any unconsumed wine bottles as provided in §60-8-3 (j) of this code and the legislative rules for carrying unconsumed wine off the licensed premises;(F) Has at least two restrooms for members and their guests: Provided, That this requirement may be waived by the local health department upon supplying a written waiver of the requirement to the commissioner: Provided, however, That the requirement may also be waived for a historic building by written waiver supplied to commissioner of the requirement from the historic association or district with jurisdiction over a historic building: Provided, further, That in no event may a private club restaurant have less than one restroom; and(G) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements.(F) "Private manufacturer club" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee An alcohol manufacturer’s bar or restaurant that is a business which is also licensed as a distillery, mini-distillery, micro-distillery, winery, farm winery, brewery, or resident brewery that manufacturers liquor, wine, hard cider, nonintoxicating beer, or nonintoxicating craft beer, which may be sold, served, and furnished to members and guests for on-premises consumption at the licensee's licensed premises and in the area or areas denoted on the licensee's floorplan, and which: (A) Has at least 100 members;(B) (i) Offers tours, may offer samples, and may offer space as a conference center or for meetings; (C) (ii) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, a refrigerator, or freezer, or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serves food: Provided, That a licensee required by the provisions of this code to serve food on premises in order to lawfully serve alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, or hard cider may meet the requirement of having on-premises food preparation facilities by, during all hours alcoholic liquors, beer, wine, and hard cider are offered for sale or sampling, having on-site an operating food truck or other portable kitchen: Provided, however, That the approval of the commissioner and the appropriate health department is required to operate; as allowed by subsection (a) of this section;(D) Maintains, at any one time fresh food capable of being prepared in the private manufacturer club's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, or canned prepared foods;(E) (iii) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses space which is contiguous, bounded, or fenced real property sufficient to safely operate the licensed premises that would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and may be used for large events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(F) (iv) Lists the entire property from paragraph (E) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private manufacturer club's manufacturer’s floorplan that would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, hard cider, and wine throughout the licensed premises, whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private manufacturer club's manufacturer’s licensed premises; and as noted on the private manufacturer club's floorplan; (G) (v) Identifies a person, persons, an entity, or entities who or which have the right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property, buildings, and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (H) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and (I) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements."Private fair and festival" means an applicant for a private club or a licensed private club licensee meeting the requirements of §60-7-8a of this code for a temporary event, and the criteria set forth in this subdivision which:(A) Has at least 100 members;(B) Has been sponsored, endorsed, or approved, in writing, by the governing body, or its duly elected or appointed officers, of either the municipality or of the county in which the festival, fair, or other event is to be conducted; (C) Prepares, provides, or engages a food vendor to provide adequate freshly prepared food or meals to serve its stated members and guests who will be attending the temporary festival, fair, or other event, and further provides any documentation or agreements to the commissioner prior to approval; (D) Does not use third-party entities or individuals to purchase, sell, furnish, or serve alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (E) Provides adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the stated members and guests who will be attending the festival, fair, or other event; (F) Provides a floorplan for the proposed premises with a defined and bounded area to safely account for the ingress and egress of stated members and guests who will be attending the festival, fair, or other event; (G) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and(H) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements.(G) A farmers market that is an association of bars, restaurants, and retailers, at least one retailer sells West Virginia-made products among other products, and other stores who open primarily during daytime hours of 6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m., but may operate in the day or evenings for special events where the sale of food and alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer may occur for on-premises consumption, such as reserved weddings, reserved dinners, pairing events, tasting events, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events. All businesses that are members of the association shall be responsible for all sales, service, furnishing, tendering, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, and hard cider occurring on the entire licensed premises of the farmer's market, including indoor and outdoor bounded areas. The applicant shall also:(i) Have one or more members operating a separate private venue restaurant license with a full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, a refrigerator or freezer or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serve freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week;(ii) Have one or more members operating a separate private venue restaurant license who maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared for events conducted at the private farmers market in the private venue restaurant's full kitchen;(iii) Have an association that owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to more than one acre, as determined by the commissioner, which is contiguous acreage of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for large contracted-for reserved weddings, reserved dinners, pairing events, tasting events, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events;(iv) Have an association that lists in the application for licensure the entire property and all adjoining buildings and structures on the farmers market's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the farmers market's licensed premises;(v) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (vi) Have at least two separate and unrelated vendors applying for the farmer’s market license;(vii) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to purchase, sell, furnish, or serve liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (viii) Provide adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the stated members and guests who will be attending the farmer's market; and(ix) Provide a security plan indicating all vendor points of service, entrances, and exits in order to verify members', patrons', and guests' ages, to verify whether a member, patron, or guest is intoxicated, and to provide for the public health and safety of members, patrons, and guests; and(H) A food court that is a number of businesses involving at least one separately licensed private venue - restaurant and that operates in a facility with one licensed floorplan that includes an association of other inter-connected licensed private venue - restaurants or unlicensed restaurants, that operate legally without alcohol sales, where all businesses that are licensed members of the association have agreed in writing to be responsible for all sales, service, furnishing, tendering, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer occurring on the entire licensed premises of the food court. The applicant shall also: (i) Have at least one member of its association who separately qualifies for a private venue restaurant containing a full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, a refrigerator or freezer or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and be capable of serving freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week in the private food court;(ii) Have at least one member of its association who qualifies for a private venue restaurant license who maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private venue restaurant's full kitchen;(iii) Have an association that owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses a facility that meets requirements of this article, and the entire facility is listed on the licensee's floorplan as its licensed premises;(iv) Have an association that lists in the application for licensure the entire facility and any inter-connected and adjoining structures on the food court's floorplan which would compromise the licensed premises, and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure while on the food court's licensed premises as noted on the private food court's licensed floorplan;(v) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises;(vi) Have at least one separate and unrelated business applying for private venue food court license;(vii) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to purchase, sell, furnish, or serve liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer;(viii) Provide adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the stated members, patrons, and guests who will be attending the private food court; and(ix) Provide a security plan indicating all businesses who will be selling and serving alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, list non-licensees who will be selling and serving food, list all entrances, and list all exits, provide a plan to verify the ages of members, patrons, and guests, a plan to verify whether a member, patron, or guest is intoxicated, and a plan to provide for the public health and safety of members, patrons, and guests."Private hotel" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee meeting the criteria set forth in this subsection which:(A) Has at least 2,000 members;(B) Offers short-term, daily rate accommodations or lodging for members and their guests amounting to at least 30 separate bedrooms, and also offers a conference center for meetings;(C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, walk-in freezers, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 20 hours per week;(D) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private hotel's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may not include microwavable, frozen, or canned foods;(E) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to more than one acre but fewer than three acres, which are contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for hotel and conferences and large contracted-for group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(F) Lists the entire property from paragraph (E) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private hotel's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer  throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private hotel's licensed premises and as noted on the private hotel's floorplan;(G) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (H) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; (I) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements; and(J) May provide members and guests who are verified by proper form of identification to be 21 years of age or older to have secure access via key or key card to an in-room mini-bar in their rented short-term accommodation; the mini-bar may be a small refrigerator not in excess of 1.6 cubic feet for the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, hard cider, and liquor sold from the original sealed container, and the refrigerator may contain: (i) Any combination of 12 fluid ounce cans or bottles not exceeding 72 fluid ounces of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (ii) any combination of cans or bottles of wine or hard cider not exceeding 750 ml of wine or hard cider; (iii) liquor in bottles sized from 50 ml, 100 ml, and 200 ml, with any combination of those liquor bottles not exceeding 750 ml; and (iv) any combination of canned or packaged food valued at least $50. All markups, fees, and taxes shall be charged on the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, liquor, and hard cider. All nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer available for sale shall be purchased from the licensed distributor in the area where licensed. All wine or hard cider available for sale shall be purchased from a licensed wine distributor or authorized farm winery. All liquor available for sale shall be purchased from the licensed retail liquor outlet in the market zone of the licensed premises. The mini-bar shall be checked daily and replenished as needed to benefit the member and guest. "Private resort hotel" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee which: (A) Has at least 5,000 members;(B) Offers short term, daily rate accommodations or lodging for members and their guests amounting to at least 50 separate bedrooms;(C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, six-burner ranges, walk-in freezers, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 25 hours per week;(D) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private resort hotel's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may not include microwavable, frozen, or canned foods;(E) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 10 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for destination, resort, and large contracted-for group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(F) Lists the entire property from paragraph (E) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private resort hotel's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors  and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private resort hotel's licensed premises;(G) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property, buildings, and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (H) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; (I) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements; (J) May have a separately licensed resident brewer with a brewpub license inner-connected via a walkway, doorway, or entryway, all as determined and approved by the commissioner, for limited access during permitted hours of operation for tours and samples at the resident brewery; and(K) May provide members and guests who are verified by proper form of identification to be 21 years of age or older to have access via key or key card to an in-room mini-bar in their rented short-term accommodation. The mini-bar may be a small refrigerator not in excess of 3.2 cubic feet for the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, hard cider, and liquor sold from the original sealed container, and the refrigerator may contain: (i) Any combination of 12 fluid ounce cans or bottles not exceeding 144 fluid ounces of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (ii) any combination of cans or bottles of wine or hard cider not exceeding one and a half liters of wine or hard cider; (iii) liquor in bottles sized from 50 ml, 100 ml, 200 ml, and 375 ml with any combination of such liquor bottles not exceeding one and a half liters; and (iv) any combination of canned or packaged food. All markups, fees, and taxes shall be charged on the sale of nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, hard cider, wine, and liquor. All nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer available for sale shall be purchased from the licensed distributor in the area where licensed. All wine or hard cider available for sale shall be purchased from a licensed wine distributor or authorized farm winery. All liquor available for sale shall be purchased from the licensed retail liquor outlet in the market zone of the licensed premises. The mini-bar shall be checked daily and replenished as needed to benefit the member and guest."Private golf club" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee which:(A) Has at least 100 members;(B) Maintains at least one 18-hole golf course with separate and distinct golf playing holes, not reusing nine golf playing holes to comprise the 18 golf playing holes, and a clubhouse;(C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week;(D) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 80 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the private golf club's floorplan and could be used for golfing events and large contracted-for group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(E) Lists the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subsection and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private golf club's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer, wine, hard cider, or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities are conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private golf club's licensed premises; (F) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property, buildings, and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and(H) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements."Private nine-hole golf course" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee which:(A) Has at least 50 members;(B) Maintains at least one nine-hole golf course with separate and distinct golf playing holes;(C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises and serves freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week;(D) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 30 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the private nine-hole golf course's floorplan and could be used for golfing events and large contracted for group-type events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(E) Lists the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private nine-hole golf course's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private nine-hole golf course's licensed premises;(F) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and(H) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements."Private tennis club" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee which:(A) Has at least 100 members;(B) Maintains at least four separate and distinct tennis courts, either indoor or outdoor, and a clubhouse or similar facility;(C) Has a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food;(D) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the private tennis club's floorplan and could be used for tennis events and large events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, tournaments, meetings, and sporting or recreational events;(E) Lists the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private tennis club's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private tennis club's licensed premises;(F) Has identified a person, persons, an entity, or entities who or which has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements; and (H) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner."Private college sports stadium" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that operates a college or university stadium or coliseum for Division I, II, or III sports and that involves a college, public or private, or university that is a member of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, or its successor, and uses the facility for football, basketball, baseball, soccer, or other Division I, II, or III sports, reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours as a bar or restaurant. The licensee may sell alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer when conducting or temporarily hosting non-collegiate sporting events. This license may be issued in the name of the National Collegiate Athletic Association Division I, II, or III college or university or the name of the primary food and beverage vendor under contract with that college or university. All alcohol sales shall take place within the confines of the college or university stadium: Provided, That any outside area approved for alcohol sales and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer shall be surrounded by a fence or other barrier prohibiting entry except upon the college or university's express permission, and under the conditions and restrictions established by the college or university, so that the alcohol sales area is closed in order to prevent entry and access by the general public. Further the applicant shall:(A) Have at least 100 members;(B) Maintain an open-air or enclosed stadium or coliseum venue primarily used for sporting events, such as football, basketball, baseball, soccer, or other Division I, II, or III sports, and also weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties shall reserve the college stadium venue in advance of the event;  (C) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens and equipment that is equivalent or greater than a private club restaurant, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises that is capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the private college sports stadium;(D) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the private college stadium's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for temporary non-collegiate sporting events, group-type weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(E) List the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private college sports stadium's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private college sports stadium's licensed premises and as noted on the private college sports stadium's floorplan;(F) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements; and (H) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner. "Private professional sports stadium" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that is only open for professional sporting events when the events are affiliated with or sponsored by a professional sporting association, reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours as a bar or restaurant. The licensee may not sell alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer when conducting or hosting non-professional sporting events, and further the applicant shall:(A) Have at least 1,000 members;(B) Maintain an open-air or enclosed stadium venue primarily used for sporting events, such as football, baseball, soccer, auto racing, or other professional sports, and also weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve the stadium venue in advance of the event;  (C) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to serve its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the private professional sports stadium;(D) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least three contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the professional sports stadium's floorplan and could be used for contracted- for professional sporting events, group-type weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(E) List the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private professional sports stadium's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private professional sports stadium's licensed premises;(F) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements; and (H) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner."Private farmers market" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that operates as an association of bars, restaurants, and retailers who sell West Virginia- made products among other products, and other stores who open primarily during daytime hours of 6:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m., but may operate in the day or evenings for special events where the sale of food and alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer may occur for on-premises consumption, such as reserved weddings, reserved dinners, pairing events, tasting events, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours as a bar or restaurant. All businesses that are members of the association shall agree in writing to be liable and responsible for all sales, service, furnishing, tendering, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, wine, and hard cider occurring on the entire licensed premises of the private farmer's market, including indoor and outdoor bounded areas. The applicant shall also:(A) Have at least 100 members;(B) Have one or more members operating a private club restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, a refrigerator or freezer or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and serve freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week;(C) Have one or more members operating a private club restaurant who maintain, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared for events conducted at the private farmers market in the private club restaurant's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may not include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, or canned prepared foods;(D) Have an association that owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to more than one acre, which is contiguous acreage of bounded or fenced real property which would be listed on the licensee's floorplan and would be used for large contracted-for reserved weddings, reserved dinners, pairing events, tasting events, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events;(E) Have an association that lists in the application for licensure the entire property and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private farmers market's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private farmers market's licensed premises and as noted on the private farmers market's floorplan;(F) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Have at least two separate and unrelated vendors applying for the private farmers market license;(H) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to purchase, sell, furnish, or serve liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer; (I) Provide adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the stated members and guests who will be attending the private farmers market; (J) Provide a security plan indicating all vendor points of service, entrances, and exits in order to verify members', patrons', and guests' ages, to verify whether a member, patron, or guest is intoxicated, and to provide for the public health and safety of members, patrons, and guests;(K) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and (L) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements."Private wedding venue or barn" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that is only open for reserved weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events and does not maintain daily or regular operating hours, and which:(A) Has at least 25 members;(B) Maintains a venue, facility, barn, or pavilion primarily used for weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve or contract for the venue, facility, barn, or pavilion in advance of the event;  (C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises that is capable of serving freshly prepared food, or engages a food caterer to provide adequate freshly prepared food or meals to serve its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the private wedding venue or barn. The applicant or licensee shall provide written documentation including a list of food caterers or written agreements regarding any food catering operations to the commissioner prior to approval of a food catering event;(D) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses space sufficient to safely operate the licensed premises. The applicant or licensee shall verify that, the property is not less than two acres and is remotely located, subject to the commissioner's approval. The bounded or fenced real property may be listed on the private wedding venue's or barn’s floorplan and may be used for large events such as weddings, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(E) Lists the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private wedding venue or barn's floorplan that would comprise the licensed premises and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private wedding venue or barn's licensed premises;(F) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements; and (H) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner."Private multi-sport complex" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that is open for multiple sports events to be played at the complex facilities, reserved weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other special events, and which:(A) Has at least 100 members;(B) Maintains an open-air multi-sport complex primarily for use for sporting events, such as baseball, soccer, basketball, tennis, frisbee, or other sports, but may also conduct weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events where parties reserve parts of the sports complex in advance of the sporting or other event; (C) Operates a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens in the licensee's main facility, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises which is capable of serving freshly prepared food, or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending the event at the private multi-sport complex. A licensee may contract with temporary food vendors or food trucks for food sales only, but not on a permanent basis, in areas of the multi-sport complex not readily accessible by the main facility; (D) Maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private multi-sport complex's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory, the commissioner may not include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable meals, frozen meals, prepackaged foods, or canned prepared foods;(E) Owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses acreage amounting to at least 50 contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the private multi-sport complex's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for sporting events, group-type weddings, concerts, reunions, conferences, meetings, or other events;(F) Lists the entire property from paragraph (E) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private multi-sport complex's floorplan which would comprise the licensed premises, and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer, nonintoxicating craft beer, and hard cider throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on the private multi-sport complex's licensed premises, as noted on the private multi-sport complex's floorplan. The licensee may sell alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer from a golf cart or food truck owned or leased by the licensee and also operated by the licensee when the golf cart or food truck is located on the private multi-sport complex's licensed premises;(G) Has an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (H) Meets and is subject to all other private club requirements; and (I) Uses an age verification system approved by the commissioner."Private coliseum or center" means an applicant for a private club or licensed private club licensee that is open for various events including, but not limited to, musical concerts, bands, sporting events, monster trucks, sports entertainment events, circuses, expos, hobby events, tradeshows, health events, reserved weddings, reunions, retreats, conventions, conferences, meetings, or other special events. The licensee may not sell alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer or wine when conducting or hosting events focused on patrons who are less than 21 years of age. The applicant shall also:(A) Have at least 5,000 members;(B) Maintain an enclosed coliseum or center venue with at least 80,000 square feet of event space primarily used for events where parties reserve the coliseum or center venue in advance of the event;  (C) Operate a restaurant and full kitchen with ovens, as determined by the commissioner, on the licensed premises and be capable of serving freshly prepared food or meals to its stated members, guests, and patrons who will be attending events at the private coliseum or center;(D) Own or lease, control, operate, and use acreage amounting to at least two contiguous acres of bounded or fenced real property, as determined by the commissioner, which would be listed on the private coliseum or center's floorplan and could be used for contracted-for events, or a private fair and festival, as authorized by the commissioner per dual licensing requirements as set forth in §60-7-2a of this code;(E) List the entire property from paragraph (D) of this subdivision and all adjoining buildings and structures on the private coliseum or center's floorplan comprising the licensed premises which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure or outdoors while on private coliseum or center's licensed premises;(F) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises; (G) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements; and (H) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner."Private food court" means an applicant who qualifies for a private club restaurant or licensed private club restaurant license that operates in a facility within a licensed premises with one licensed floorplan that includes an association of other inter-connected licensed private club restaurants or unlicensed restaurants that operate legally without alcohol sales, where all businesses that are licensed members of the association have agreed in writing to be liable and responsible for all sales, service, furnishing, tendering, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer occurring on the entire licensed premises of the private food court. The applicant shall also:(A) Have at least 100 members;(B) Have at least one member of its association who qualifies for a private club restaurant containing a full kitchen with ovens, four-burner ranges, a refrigerator or freezer or some combination of a refrigerator and freezer, and other kitchen utensils and apparatus as determined by the commissioner on the licensed premises and be capable of serving freshly prepared food at least 15 hours per week in the private food court;(C) Have at least one member of its association who qualifies for a private club restaurant license who maintains, at any one time, fresh food capable of being prepared in the private club restaurant's full kitchen. In calculating the food inventory the commissioner may not include bags of chips or similar products, microwavable meals, frozen meals, pre-packaged foods, or canned prepared foods;(D) Have an association that owns or leases, controls, operates, and uses a facility that meets requirements of this article, and the entire facility is listed on the licensee's floorplan as its licensed premises;(E) Have an association that lists in the application for licensure the entire facility and any inter-connected and adjoining structures on the private food court's floorplan which would compromise the licensed premises, and which would be authorized for the lawful sales, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises whether these activities were conducted in a building or structure while on the private food court's licensed premises as noted on the private food court's licensed floorplan;(F) Have an identified person, persons, or entity that has right, title, and ownership or lease interest in the real property buildings and structures located on the proposed licensed premises;(G) Have at least one separate and unrelated business applying for private food court license;(H) Only use its employees, independent contractors, or volunteers to purchase, sell, furnish, or serve liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer;(I) Provide adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the stated members, patrons, and guests who will be attending the private food court;(J) Provide a security plan indicating all businesses who will be selling and serving alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, list non-licensees who will be selling and serving food, list all entrances, and list all exits, provide a plan to verify the ages of members, patrons, and guests, a plan to verify whether a member, patron, or guest is intoxicated, and a plan to provide for the public health and safety of members, patrons, and guests;(K) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner; and(L) Meet and be subject to all other private club requirements.(b) All licenses under this article shall use an age verification system approved by the commissioner, and must meet and are subject to all other private club and private club type requirements, private wine venue requirements set forth in §60-8-1 et seq. of this code, and tavern requirements set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code.(c) The Division of Natural Resources, the authority governing any county or municipal park, or any county commission, municipality, other governmental entity, public corporation, or public authority operating any park or airport may lease, as lessor, a building or portion thereof or other limited premises in any park or airport to any corporation or unincorporated association for the establishment of a private club type pursuant to this article. §60-7-2a. Dual licensing permitted; conditions. (a) A private venue - coliseum or center may permit a private fair and festival licensee to conduct the temporary special event, authorized by that license, within, or on the private coliseum or center licensee's licensed premises, in order to create tourism opportunities that will promote brewers, resident brewers, wineries, farm wineries, distilleries, mini-distilleries, and micro-distilleries in this state. (b) A private venue - coliseum or center licensee may host a special event for a private fair and festival licensee on the licensee's licensed premises if both licensees are in good standing with the commissioner and submit to the commissioner the temporary floorplan revisions of the private coliseum or center in which the special event would be held to comprise the special event's lawful premises, which shall only include spaces in buildings or rooms of the private venue - coliseum or center's licensed premises. By contractual agreement between the private venue -coliseum or center licensee and the private fair and festival licensee, the parties shall agree that the private venue - coliseum or center maintains control of its licensed premises, but for a set contracted rental time period.  The private fair and festival licensee shall safely account for the ingress and egress of the stated members and guests who will be attending the special event at the licensed premises. During the contracted rental time period, the private fair and festival licensee is wholly responsible and liable for the proper sale and serving of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer in the area designated as the private fair and festival's temporary floorplan, as set forth in this section. The  private fair and festival's temporary floorplan shall comprise the private fair and festival's licensed premises for the temporary special event, which is authorized for the lawful sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer throughout the private fair and festival's licensed premises during this dually licensed temporary special event: Provided, That the private fair and festival's licensed premises dually shared and licensed with the private coliseum or center shall: (1) Have facilities to prepare and serve food and alcohol; (2) Have adequate restrooms and sufficient building facilities for the expected number of members and guests attending the event; (3) Comply with all other requirements of its license in this article; and (4) Comply with health, fire, safety, and zoning requirements.(c) There is no limit on the number of private fair and festivals that may be held at a private coliseum or center.(d) The ability for a private outdoor designated area as defined in §8-12-26 of the code to simultaneously have multiple qualified permit holders as defined in §60-7-1 et seq. of the code, is expressly authorized. §60-7-6. Annual license fee; partial fee; and reactivation fee. (a) The annual license fee for a license issued under the provisions of this article to a fraternal or veterans' organization or a nonprofit social club is $750 $1,000 and notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, this license must include the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code.(b) The annual license fee for a license issued under the provisions of this article to a private club other than a private club of the type specified in subsection (a) of this section is $1,000 if the private club bar or restaurant has fewer than 1,000 members; $1,000 for a private club restaurant, private hotel, or private resort hotel to be licensed as a private caterer as defined in §60-7-2 of this code; $500 if the private club is a private bakery; $1,500 if the private club is a private wedding venue or barn or a private cigar shop; $2,000 if the private club is a private nine-hole golf course, private farmers market, private food truck, private college sports stadium, private professional sports stadium, private multi-sport complex, private manufacturer club, or a private tennis club as defined in §60-7-2 of this code; $2,500 if the private club bar or private club restaurant has 1,000 or more members; and  $2,000 if the private club is a private hotel with three or fewer designated areas, a private golf club as defined in §60-7-2 of this code, a private coliseum or center as defined in §60-7-2 of this code, or a private food court as defined in §60-7-2 of this code. If the private club is a private resort hotel as defined in §60-7-2 of this code, the private resort hotel may designate areas within the licensed premises for the lawful sale, service, and consumption of alcoholic liquors, nonintoxicating beer and nonintoxicating craft beer as provided for by this article. The annual license fee for a private resort hotel with five or fewer designated areas is $7,500 and the annual license fee for a private resort hotel with at least six, but no more than 10 designated areas is $12,500. The annual license fee for a private resort hotel with at least 11, but no more than 15 designated areas is $17,500. The annual license fee for a private resort hotel with no fewer than 15 nor more than 20 designated areas is $22,500. A private resort hotel that obtained the license and paid the $22,500 annual license fee may, upon application to and approval of the commissioner, designate additional areas for a period not to exceed seven days for an additional fee of $150 per day, per designated area. private accommodation is $2,500 per area: (1) A hotel, bed and breakfast, or short-term rental are authorized for up to two areas; and (2) A resort hotel is authorized for three to 20 areas, and after 20 areas the fee is $1,000 an area. The private accommodation annual license fee, notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, includes the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code(c) The fee for any license issued following January 1 of any year that expires on June 30 of that year is one half of the annual license fee prescribed by subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The annual license fee for a license issued under the provisions of this article to a private sports venue is $3,000, and notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, this license must include the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code.(d) The annual license fee for a license issued under the provisions of this article to a private venue is $2,000, and notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, this license must include the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code.(d) (e) A licensee that fails to complete a renewal application and make payment of its annual license fee in renewing its license on or before June 30 of any subsequent year, after initial application, shall be charged an additional $150 reactivation fee. The fee payment may not be prorated or refunded, and the reactivation fee shall be paid prior to the processing of any renewal application and payment of the applicable full year annual license fee. A licensee who continues to operate upon the expiration of its license is subject to all fines, penalties, and sanctions available in §60-7-13 and §60-7-13a of this code, all as determined by the commissioner.(e) (f) The commissioner shall pay the fees to the State Treasurer for deposit into the General Revenue Fund of the state.(f) The Legislature finds that the hospitality industry has been particularly damaged by the COVID-19 pandemic and that some assistance is warranted to promote reopening and continued operation of private clubs and restaurants licensed under this article. Accordingly, the fees set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section are temporarily modified as follows;(1) License fees for the license period beginning July 1, 2021, shall be reduced to one third of the rate set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section;(2) License fees for the license period beginning July 1, 2022, shall be two thirds of the rate set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section; and(3) License fees for the license period beginning July 1, 2023, and beyond, shall be as set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section. §60-7-8b. One-day charitable rare, antique, or vintage liquor auction; licensee fee and application; license subject to provisions of article; exceptions. (a) The commissioner may issue a special one-day, license to a licensed private club venue – restaurant in partnership with one or more duly organized, federally approved nonprofit corporations, associations, organizations, or entities allowing the nonprofit to conduct a charitable auction of certain sealed bottles of rare, antique, or vintage liquor, as determined by the commissioner, on the private club venue – restaurant licensee’s licensed premises for off-premises consumption only, when raising money for athletic, charitable, educational, scientific, or religious purposes. A licensed private club venue – restaurant may not receive more than 12 licenses under this section per year.(b) "Auction or auctioning", for the purposes of this section, means any silent, physical act, or verbal bid auction, where the auction requires in-person bidding at a licensed private club or online internet-based auction bidding, with bidders present at the licensed private club during the nonprofit auction, through a secure internet-based application or website. (c) Requirements.—(1) The licensed private club venue – restaurant and nonprofit shall jointly complete an application, at least 15 days prior to the event. The application may require, but is not limited to, information relating to the date, time, place, floorplan of the charitable event, and any other information as the commissioner may require. The applicants shall include with the application a written signed and notarized statement that at least 80 percent of the net proceeds from the charitable event will be donated directly to the nonprofit. The commissioner may audit the licensed private club and nonprofit to verify the 80 percent requirement has been met.(2) The licensed private club venue – restaurant and nonprofit must be in good standing with the commissioner, and the applicants must receive the commissioner’s approval prior to the charitable event. (3) The licensed private club venue – restaurant and nonprofit shall submit, and the commissioner shall review, the applicants’ list of rare, antique, or vintage liquor, and the applicants shall submit documentation showing that the liquor was purchased from a licensed retail outlet in accordance with §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code with all taxes and fees paid. Any rare, antique, or vintage liquor with no documentation or that was not purchased in accordance with §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code, may be approved for auction, if all taxes and fees are paid to the commissioner in accordance with §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code. Any undocumented rare, antique, or vintage liquor approved for charitable auction by the commissioner must be labeled in the interest of public health and safety: "Purchase and consume at your own risk, as the authenticity or source of manufacture of this bottle has not been verified". (4) The private club venue – restaurant and nonprofit may not deliver, mail, or ship sealed or unsealed rare, antique, or vintage liquor bottles. (5) The winning bidder of the auctioned rare, antique, or vintage liquor shall pay and receive the sealed rare, antique, or vintage liquor bottle before the conclusion of the event.(6) The applicants shall pay a $150 nonrefundable and nonprorated fee for the license. (d) Exceptions. — (1) A nonprofit’s charitable auctioning of sealed rare, antique, or vintage liquor bottles, as determined by the commissioner, is permitted on the private club’s venue – restaurant’s licensed premises, notwithstanding the bingo, raffle, and lottery provisions of §47-20-10, §47-21-11, and §61-10-1 et seq. of this code, but in compliance with the auction requirements of §19-2c-1 et seq. of this code;   (2) The nonprofit, upon licensure by this section, is permitted a limited, one-time exception of the requirement to be a licensed retail outlet and hold a retail license issued pursuant to §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code to sell liquor; and(3) The private club venue – restaurant, upon licensure by this section, is provided a limited, one-time exception from §60-7-12(a)(1) and §60-6-8(6) of this code, to permit the licensed nonprofit to sell at auction the sealed rare, antique, or vintage liquor bottles for off-premises consumption, to permit the carrying onto, the sale of, and the carrying off of the licensed premises the approved sealed liquor bottles. Any private club venue – restaurant or nonprofit licensed pursuant to this code section are subject to all penalties for violations committed under §60-3A-1 et seq. of this code and §60-7-1 et seq. of this code. §60-7-8c. Special license for a multi-vendor private fair and festival; license fee and application; license subject to provisions of article; exception. [Repealed.] §60-7-8d. Where private clubs club types may sell and serve alcoholic liquors and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer. (a) With prior approval of the commissioner, a private club type licensee may sell, serve, and furnish alcoholic liquor and, if licensed to also sell, serve, and furnish nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer to be consumed on premises in a legally demarcated area which may include a temporary private outdoor dining area or temporary private outdoor street dining area. A temporary private outdoor street dining area shall be approved by the municipal government or county commission in which the licensee operates. The commissioner shall develop and make available an application form to facilitate the purposes of this subsection. (b) The private club type licensee shall submit to the commissioner: (1) the municipal or county approval of the private outdoor dining area or private outdoor street dining area; and, (2) a revised floorplan requesting to sell alcoholic liquors, and when licensed, for nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer, subject to the commissioner’s requirements, in an approved and bounded outdoor area. The approved and bounded area need not be adjacent to the licensee’s licensed premises, but in close proximity, for private outdoor street dining or private outdoor dining. For purposes of this subsection, "close proximity" means an available area within 300 feet of a licensee’s licensed premises and under the licensee’s control and with right of ingress and egress. (c) This private outdoor dining or private outdoor street dining may be operated in conjunction with a private wine outdoor dining or private wine outdoor street dining area set forth in §60-8-32a of this code and nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer outdoor dining or outdoor street dining set forth in §11-16-9 of this code. (d) For purposes of this section, private outdoor dining and private outdoor street dining include dining areas that are: (1) Outside and not served by an HVAC system for air handling services and use outside air; (2) Open to the air; and(3) Not enclosed by fixed or temporary walls; however, the commissioner may seasonally approve a partial enclosure with up to three temporary or fixed walls.Any area where seating is incorporated inside a permanent building with ambient air through HVAC is not considered outdoor dining pursuant to this subsection. (e) A private venue club restaurant or a private manufacturer club licensed for craft cocktail growler sales shall provide food or a meal along with sealed craft cocktail growler sales as set forth in this article to a patron who is (i) in-person or in-vehicle while picking up food or a meal, or (ii) in-person having dined on food or a meal, and (iii) has ordered a sealed craft cocktail growler to-go, subject to verification that the purchasing person is 21 years of age or older, and not visibly, or noticeably intoxicated, and as otherwise specified in this article. §60-7-8e. Private club venue - restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club licensee’s authority to sell craft cocktail growlers. (a) Legislative findings. — The Legislature hereby finds that it is in the public interest to regulate, control, and support the brewing, manufacturing, distribution, sale, consumption, transportation, and storage of liquor and its industry in this state to protect the public health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this state and promote hospitality and tourism. Therefore, this section authorizes a licensed private club venue - restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer, club, to have certain abilities to promote the sale of liquor manufactured in this state for the benefit of the citizens of this state, the state’s growing distilling industry, and the state’s hospitality and tourism industry, all of which are vital components for the state’s economy.(b) Sales of craft cocktail growlers. — A licensed private club venue - restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club may under a current and valid license that meets the requirements of this section may offer a craft cocktail growler in the ratio of up to one fluid ounce of liquor to four fluid ounces of nonalcoholic beverages or mixers, not to exceed 128 fluid ounces for the entire beverage in the craft cocktail growler, for retail sale to patrons from their licensed premises in a sealed craft cocktail growler for personal consumption only off of the licensed premises. Prior to the sale, the licensee shall verify in-person, using proper identification, that any patron purchasing the craft cocktail growler is 21 years of age or older and that the patron is not visibly or noticeably intoxicated. There is a $100 non-prorated, non-refundable no annual fee to sell craft cocktail growlers. (c) Retail sales. — Every licensee licensed under this section shall comply with all the provisions of this chapter applicable to retail sale of liquor at retail liquor outlets, shall comply with markup specified in §60-3A-17(e)(2) of this code when conducting sealed craft cocktail growler sales, and is subject to all applicable requirements and penalties in this article.(d) Payment of taxes. — Every licensee licensed under this section shall pay all sales taxes required of retail liquor outlets, in addition to any other taxes required, and meet any applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rule of the commissioner.(e) Advertising. — Every licensee licensed under this section may only advertise a particular brand or brands of liquor manufactured by a distillery, mini-distillery, or micro-distillery upon written approval from the distillery, mini-distillery, micro-distillery, or an authorized and licensed broker to the licensee. Advertisements may not encourage intemperance or target minors.(f) Craft cocktail growler defined. — For purposes of this chapter, "Craft Cocktail Growler" means a container or jug that is made of glass, ceramic, metal, plastic, or other material approved by the commissioner, that may be no larger than 128 fluid ounces in size and must be capable of being securely sealed. The growler may be used by an authorized licensee for purposes of off-premises sales only of liquor and a nonalcoholic mixer or beverage for personal consumption not on a licensed premise. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, a securely sealed craft cocktail growler is not an open container under state and local law. A craft cocktail growler with a broken seal is an open container under state and local law unless it is located in an area of the motor vehicle physically separated from the passenger compartment. A craft cocktail growler is not an original container of liquor, but once sanitized, filled, properly sealed, and sold, all as set forth in this article, is a sealed container. (g) Craft cocktail growler requirements. — A licensee licensed under this section shall prevent patrons from accessing the secure area where the filling of the craft cocktail or craft cocktail growler occurs. A licensee licensed under this section shall sanitize, fill, securely seal, and label any craft cocktail growler prior to its sale. A licensee licensed under this section may refill a craft cocktail growler subject to the requirements of this section. A licensee licensed under this section shall visually inspect any craft cocktail growler before filling or refilling it. A licensee licensed under this section may not fill or refill any craft cocktail growler that appears to be cracked, broken, unsafe, or otherwise unfit to serve as a sealed beverage container. For purposes of this article, a secure sealing means using a tamper-evident seal, such as: (1) A plastic heat shrink wrap band, strip, or sleeve extending around the cap or lid of craft cocktail growler to form a seal that must be broken when the container is opened; or (2) A screw top cap or lid that breaks apart when the craft cocktail growler is opened.   (h) Craft cocktail growler labeling. — A licensee licensed under this section selling craft cocktail growlers shall affix a conspicuous label on all sold and securely sealed craft cocktail growlers listing the name of the licensee selling the craft cocktail growler, the brand of the liquor in the craft cocktail growler, the type of craft cocktail or name of the craft cocktail, the alcohol content by volume of the liquor in the craft cocktail growler, and the date the craft cocktail growler was filled or refilled. All labeling on the craft cocktail growler shall be consistent with all federal labeling and warning requirements.(i) Craft cocktail growler sanitation. — A licensee licensed under this section shall clean and sanitize all craft cocktail growlers he or she fills or refills in accordance with all state and county health requirements prior to its sealing. In addition, the licensee licensed under this section shall sanitize, in accordance with all state and county health requirements, all taps, tap lines, pipe lines, barrel tubes, and any other related equipment used to fill or refill craft cocktail growlers. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in penalties under this article: Provided, That, if the reuse or refilling of a craft cocktail growler would violate federal law such craft cocktail growler may only be used one-time, for one filling, and shall be discarded after the one-time use.(j) Pre-mixing of craft cocktail. — A licensee licensed under this section may pre-mix the nonalcoholic beverages or mixers in the advance of a craft cocktail growler purchase and sealing, and add the liquor, as set forth in this section, upon a member or guest’s purchase of a craft cocktail growler. A licensee licensed under this section shall dispose of any expired premixed nonalcoholic beverages or mixers pursuant to Bureau for Public Health requirements when such premixed nonalcoholic beverages or mixers are no longer fit for human consumption. A licensee authorized under §60-6-8(7) of this code may use a premixed beverage meeting the requirements of that section and is also subject to the requirements of this section for a craft cocktail growler. (k) Limitations on licensees. — A licensee licensed under this section shall not sell craft cocktail growlers to other licensees, but only to its members and guests. A licensee licensed under this section shall provide food or a meal along with one sealed craft cocktail growler to a patron who is in-person or in-vehicle while picking up food or a meal, or who dined in-person on food or a meal and has ordered and a sealed craft cocktail growler-to-go, subject to verification that the purchasing person is 21 years of age or older, and not visibly or noticeably intoxicated, and as otherwise specified in this article. A licensee licensed under this section may only sell one sealed craft cocktail growler to a patron or one craft cocktail growler per food or meal in the order delivered per §60-7-8f of this code. A licensee licensed under this section shall be subject to the applicable penalties under this article for violations of this article.(l) Rules. — The commissioner, in consultation with the Bureau for Public Health, may propose legislative rules concerning sanitation for legislative approval, pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, to implement the purposes of this section. §60-7-8f. Private delivery license for a licensed private club venue - restaurant, private venue – alcohol manufacturer club, or a third party; requirements; limitations; third party license fee; private cocktail delivery permit; and requirements. (a) A licensed private club venue- restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club licensed to sell liquor for on-premises consumption may apply for a private delivery license permitting the order, sale, and delivery of liquor and a nonalcoholic mixer or beverage in a sealed craft cocktail growler, when separately licensed for craft cocktail growler sales. The order, sale, and delivery of a sealed craft cocktail growler is permitted for off-premises consumption when completed by the licensee to a person purchasing the craft cocktail growler through a telephone, a mobile ordering application, or web-based software program, authorized by the licensee’s license. There is no additional fee for a licensed private club venue- restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club to obtain a private delivery license. The order, sale, and delivery process shall meet the requirements of this section. The order, sale, and delivery process is subject to the penalties of this article. (b) A third party, not licensed for liquor sales or distribution, may apply for a private delivery license for the privilege of ordering and delivery of craft cocktail growlers, from a licensee with a craft cocktail growler license. The order and delivery of a sealed craft cocktail growler is permitted by a third party who obtains a license under this section when a private club venue - restaurant or private venue alcohol manufacturer club sells to a person purchasing the sealed craft cocktail growler through telephone orders, a mobile ordering application, or a web-based software program. The private delivery license nonprorated, nonrefundable annual fee is $200 for each third party entity, with no limit on the number of drivers and vehicles. (c) The private delivery license application shall comply with licensure requirements in this article and shall require any information required by the commissioner: Provided, That the license application may not require a third party applicant to furnish information pursuant to §60-7-12 of this code. (d) Sale Requirements. — (1) The craft cocktail growler purchase shall accompany the purchase of prepared food or a meal and the completion of the sale may be accomplished by the delivery of the prepared food or a meal, and craft cocktail growler by the licensed private club venue- restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer, club, or third party private delivery licensee;(2) Any purchasing person shall be 21 years of age or older, shall not be visibly or noticeably intoxicated at the time of delivery, and shall meet the requirements set forth in this chapter for the sale of alcoholic liquors and as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of the code for nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer.(3) "Prepared food or a meal" for this article, means food that has been cooked, grilled, fried, deep-fried, air-fried, smoked, boiled, broiled, twice baked, blanched, sautéed, or in any other manner freshly made and prepared, and does not include pre-packaged food from the manufacturer.(4) An order, sale, and delivery may consist of multiple sealed craft cocktail growlers for each order of food or meal: Provided, That the entire delivery order may not contain any combination of craft cocktail growlers of more than 128 fluid ounces total; and (5) A third party private delivery licensee shall not have a pecuniary interest in a private club venue- restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club licensee, as set forth in this article. A third party private delivery licensee may only charge a convenience fee for the delivery of any alcohol. The third party private delivery licensee may not collect a percentage of the delivery order for the delivery of alcohol, but may continue to collect a percentage of the delivery order directly related to the prepared food or a meal. The convenience fee charged by the third-party private delivery licensee to the purchasing person shall be no greater than $20 per delivery order where a craft cocktail growler is ordered by the purchasing person. For any third party licensee also licensed for wine growler delivery as set forth in §60-8-6c of the code, or nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer growler delivery as set forth in §11-16-6d of the code, the total convenience fee of any order, sale, and delivery of a sealed growler, wine growler, or craft cocktail growler shall not exceed $20. (e) Craft Cocktail Growler Delivery Requirements. — (1) Delivery persons employed for the delivery of a sealed craft cocktail growler shall be 21 years of age or older. The licensed private club venue- restaurant, private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee shall file each delivery person’s name, driver’s license, and vehicle information with the commissioner;(2) The licensed private club venue – restaurant, private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee shall train delivery persons on verifying legal identification and in identifying the signs of intoxication. The licensee shall submit certification of the training to the commissioner; (3) The third party delivery licensee, or the private club venue- restaurant, or private manufacturing club venue – alcohol manufacturer shall hold a private cocktail delivery permit for each vehicle delivering a craft cocktail growler pursuant to subsection (g) of this section: Provided, That a delivery driver may retain an electronic copy of his or her permit as proof of licensure.(4) Prepared food or a meal, and a sealed craft cocktail growler order delivered by a third party private delivery licensee, a private club venue – restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club may occur in the county or contiguous counties where the licensed private club venue - restaurant or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club is located;(5) The licensed private club venue- restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee may only deliver prepared food or a meal, and a sealed craft cocktail growler to addresses located in West Virginia. The licensed private venue club restaurant, private manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee shall account for and pay all sales and municipal taxes;(6) The licensed private club venue- restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee may not deliver prepared food or a meal, and a sealed craft cocktail growler to any other licensee;(7) Deliveries of prepared food or a meal, and a sealed craft cocktail growler are only for personal use, and not for resale; and(8) The licensed private club venue- restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee shall not deliver and leave the prepared food or a meal, and a sealed craft cocktail growler at any address without verifying a person’s age and identification as required by this section.(f) Telephone, mobile ordering application, or web-based software requirements. — (1) The delivery person may only permit the person who placed the order through a telephone order, a mobile ordering application, or web-based software to accept the prepared food or meal and a craft cocktail growler delivery, subject to age verification upon delivery with the delivery person’s visual review and age verification;  (2) Any mobile ordering application or web-based software used shall include the delivery driver’s name and vehicle information and delivery shall be subject to legal identification verification; (3) Any telephone ordering system shall maintain a log or record of the purchasing person’s identification and details of the sale, accessible by the delivery driver for verification, shall include the delivery driver’s name and vehicle information, and delivery shall be subject to legal identification verification;  (4) All records are subject to inspection by the commissioner. The licensed private club venue - restaurant, private venue – alcohol manufacturer club, or third party private delivery licensee shall retain records for three years, and may not unreasonably withhold the records from the commissioner’s inspection; and  (5) The third party private delivery licensee, or the private club venue– restaurant, or private manufacturing club venue - alcohol manufacturer shall hold a valid private cocktail delivery permit under subsection (g) of this section for each vehicle used for delivery: Provided, That a delivery driver may retain an electronic copy of his or her permit as proof of licensure.(g) Private Cocktail Delivery Permit. —(1) The licensed private club venue - restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer, club, or third party private delivery licensee shall obtain and maintain a retail transportation permit for the delivery of prepared food and a sealed craft cocktail growler, subject to the requirements of this article.(2) A third party private delivery licensee, a private club venue – restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club licensee shall provide vehicle and driver information, requested by the commissioner. Upon any change in vehicles or drivers, the licensee shall update the driver and vehicle information with the commissioner within 10 days of the change.(3) In conjunction with §60-6-12 of this code, a private cocktail delivery permit shall meet the requirements of a transportation permit authorizing the permit holder to transport liquor subject to the requirements of this chapter.  (h) Enforcement. — (1) The third party private delivery licensee, the private club venue- restaurant, or private venue - alcohol manufacturer club licensed by this section are responsible for any violations committed by their employees or independent contractors under this article, and more than one violation may be issued for a single violation involving multiple licensees, employees, or independent contractors. (2) Any license or permit granted by this section is subject to the penalties of probation, monetary fines, suspension, and revocation, as set forth in this article, for violations committed by the licensee, its employees, or independent contractors. (3) It is a violation for any licensee, its employees, or independent contractors to break the seal of a craft cocktail growler. The licensees in violation are subject to the maximum penalties available in this article. (4) For purposes of criminal enforcement of the provisions of this article, persons ordering, purchasing, and accepting delivery of orders are considered to be purchasers. §60-7-8g. Special permit for a qualified permit holder in a private outdoor designated area; license fee and application; license subject to provisions of article. (a) There is hereby created a special permit, designated Class S4, for the sale of liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer, and nonintoxicating craft beer in a private outdoor designated area that has been approved by a municipality pursuant to §8-12-26 of this code. Each Class S4 permittee may sell, furnish, or serve liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer, and nonintoxicating craft beer as provided in this section.(b) Definitions:(1) "Private outdoor designated area" means public property that has become a legally demarcated area established by a municipal ordinance as set forth in §8-12-26 of this code for the consumption of liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer, and nonintoxicating craft beer.(2) "Qualified permit holder" means the holder of any of the following:(i) A Class A private club type license or Class S2 or Class S3 license issued under this article;(ii) A Class A tavern or brewpub license or Class S or Class S1 license issued under §11-16-1 et seq. of this code; (iii) A Class A private wine venue restaurant, private wine bed and breakfast, or private wine spa license issued under §60-8-1 et seq. of this code; (iv) A Class A hard cider license issued under §60-8A-1 et seq. of this code; or(v) A Class S4N permit issued under §60-7-8h of this code. (c) To be eligible for the special Class S4 permit authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the qualified permit holder shall: (1) Operate in a private outdoor designated area created by municipal ordinance as set forth in §8-12-26 of this code, and provide the commissioner a copy of the certified ordinance from the municipality;(2) Apply to the commissioner for the special permit prior to operating in an approved private outdoor designated area on an application provided by the commissioner;(3) Pay a nonrefundable non-prorated annual special permit fee of $100 to the commissioner: Provided, That this fee does not apply to qualified permit holders with a Class S1, Class S2, or Class S3 license, which are subject only to the applicable fees in §11-16-1 et seq. and §60-7-1 et seq. of this code;(4) Be in compliance with all state and federal laws and be in good standing with the commissioner; (5) Be approved by the municipality to operate in the private outdoor designated area;(6) Provide the days and hours of operation in the private outdoor designated area;(7) Provide, in conjunction with the municipality, adequate restroom facilities, whether permanent or portable, to serve the members, patrons, and guests who will be attending the private outdoor designated area;  (8) Provide a security plan for the private outdoor designated area indicating: All qualified permit holders' licensed premises where alcohol will be served in approved non-glass containers; all entrances and exits in order to verify members', patrons', and guests' ages, and to assess whether a member, patron, or guest is under 21 years of age or intoxicated; and a plan to provide for the public health and safety of members, patrons, and guests; (9) Provide a floorplan for the private outdoor designated area indicating a legally demarcated area that is bounded or uses signage to safely account for the ingress and egress of members, patrons, and guests who will be within the private outdoor designated area and also be permitted to carry liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer, and nonintoxicating craft beer on and off of the qualified permit holders' licensed premises and within the private outdoor designated area when contained in an approved non-glass container: Provided, That customers within the private outdoor designated area may carry alcoholic beverages purchased from any holder of a Class S4 or S4N permit and served in an approved non-glass container into and out of, and consume the beverages within, the establishment of any other holder of a Class S4 or S4N permit within the applicable private outdoor designated area. The private outdoor designated area's floorplan does comprise a separate licensed premises authorized only for the lawful consumption of liquor, wine, nonintoxicating beer, or nonintoxicating craft beer throughout the licensed premises when lawfully purchased from a qualified permit holder;(10) Meet and be subject to all other applicable license requirements;(11) Provide a plan to prevent members, guests, and patrons from bringing, consuming, or selling alcohol not in an approved non-glass container in the private outdoor designated area; and(12) Use an age verification system approved by the commissioner.(d) Notwithstanding the requirement to acquire a Class S4 or S4N permit to operate within a private outdoor designated area set forth in §60-7-8g(c) of this code, the holder of a Class S, Class S1, Class S2, or Class S3 license may participate in a private outdoor designated area on the premises of a Class S4 or S4N permit holder if that Class S4 or S4N permit holder grants permission, in writing, for the Class S, Class S1, Class S2, or Class S3 licensee to participate. A Class S, Class S1, Class S2, or Class S3 licensee may not participate in a private outdoor designated area pursuant to such written permission unless it has first met all applicable permit and fee requirements found in §11-16-1 et seq. and §60-7-1 et seq. of this code. (e) As set forth in §8-12-26 of this code a municipality may, by ordinance, establish a private outdoor designated area where the municipality may zone, set requirements, and establish conditions for safe operation of a private outdoor designated area by qualified permit holders. (f) A municipality is responsible for the enforcement of any criminal violations occurring in a private outdoor designated area and shall report such violations to the commissioner for a determination of any violation of §11-16-1 et seq. and chapter 60 of this code. (g) The commissioner shall enforce any violations of §11-16-1 et seq. and §60-1-1 et seq. of this code committed by individual qualified permit holders against their permit and any other current license issued by the commissioner to the qualified permit holder alleged to be in violation. (h) A qualified permit holder that is separately authorized for an outdoor dining area or sidewalk dining area may continue to operate those areas in conjunction with the private outdoor designated area subject to the commissioner's requirements. Notwithstanding any other section of the code, a private outdoor designated area is authorized to simultaneously host multiple qualified permit holders as defined in §60-7-1 et seq. of the code. 	(i) A qualified permit holder that also is licensed and operates a Class A licensee under §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, §60-7-1 et seq. of this code, or §60-8-1 et seq. of this code, and that is approved for operating within the private outdoor designated area may operate a pedal bike for alcohol sales authorized by the Class A licensee’s license on a pedal bike while the pedal bike is operating in the private outdoor designated area. A pedal bike is a pedal-powered portable bar on wheels, with a driver in the captain’s seat, capable of holding between 10 to 16 patrons who may pedal while being served alcohol and consuming alcohol from a private outdoor designated area cup while on the pedal bike. Additional pedal bike requirements:  (1) The pedal bike must have pedals for each patron and may have an electric or gas assist for the pedaling, and may only operate on streets with a posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour or less within the private outdoor designated area. (2) Patrons on the pedal bike must all be verified as 21 years of age or older. (3) The pedal bike must be approved by the commissioner, and a municipality must authorize the pedal bike’s alcohol sales and the pedal bike’s operation on public roads within a private outdoor designated area. Further, the municipality must exempt the pedal bike driver from any open container laws and driving-under-the-influence laws that would hold the driver responsible for patrons who are being sold, tendered, served, and consuming alcohol while passengers on the pedal bike in the private outdoor designated area. (4) The driver may not consume alcohol, if the driver is found to have consumed alcohol, then this privilege may be revoked immediately by the commissioner and the municipality. (5) The patrons may leave the pedal bike and take their private outdoor designated area cup containing alcohol from the pedal bike to the private outdoor designated area and continue to consume the alcohol from the cup, if they remain in the private outdoor designated area. (6) There may not be any glass containers used for serving, tendering, selling, or consuming alcohol or non-alcohol drinks on the pedal bike. (j) A licensee permitted under this section is subject to all other provisions of the article under which the licensee's license is issued, as well as to the rules and orders of the commissioner: Provided, That the commissioner may, by rule or order, allow certain waivers or exceptions with respect to those provisions, rules, or orders as required by the circumstances of the operation of qualified permit holders in each private outdoor designated area. The commissioner may revoke or suspend immediately any permit issued under this section prior to any notice or hearing, notwithstanding §60-7-13a of this code: Provided, however, That under no circumstances may the provisions of §60-7-12 of this code be waived or an exception granted with respect thereto. §60-7-15. License for the sale of nonintoxicating beer. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, no licensee shall be prohibited from obtaining a license for the sale of nonintoxicating beer under the provisions of article sixteen of chapter eleven §11-16-1 et seq. of this code because such licensee sells alcoholic liquors, permits the consumption of alcoholic liquor on his or her premises, or is the holder of a federal tax stamp permitting the sale of such alcoholic liquor. Further, the sale of nonintoxicating beer by a licensee licensed under this article is permitted and notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, the private club type license shall include the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code. ARTICLE 8. SALE OF WINES. §60-8-2. Definitions. Unless the context in which used clearly requires a different meaning, as used in this article:"Commissioner" or "commission" means the West Virginia Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner."Distributor" means any person whose principal place of business is within the State of West Virginia who makes purchases from a supplier to sell or distribute wine to retailers, grocery stores, private wine venues, bed and breakfasts, private wine restaurants, private wine spas, private clubs, or private club types, or wine specialty shops and that sells or distributes nonfortified dessert wine, port, sherry, and Madeira wines to wine specialty shops retailers with special wines, private wine restaurants venues, private clubs, or retailers private club types under authority of this article, and maintains a warehouse in this state for the distribution of wine. For the purpose of a distributor only, the term "person" means and includes an individual, firm, trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation. Any trust licensed as a distributor or any trust that is an owner of a distributor licensee, and the trustee or other persons in active control of the activities of the trust relating to the distributor license, is liable for acts of the trust or its beneficiaries relating to the distributor license that are unlawful acts or violations of this article, notwithstanding the liability of trustees in §44D-10-1 et seq. of this code."Fortified wine" means any wine to which brandy or other alcohol has been added where the alcohol content by volume does not exceed 24 percent, and includes nonfortified dessert wines where the alcohol content by volume is greater than 17 percent and does not exceed 24 percent."Grocery store" means any retail establishment, commonly known as a grocery store, supermarket, delicatessen, caterer, or party supply store, where food, food products, and supplies for the table are sold for consumption off the premises with average monthly sales (exclusive of sales of wine) of not less than $500 and an average monthly inventory (exclusive of inventory of wine) of not less than $500. The term "grocery store" also includes and means a separate and segregated portion of any other retail store which is dedicated solely to the sale of food, food products, and supplies for the table for consumption off the premises with average monthly sales with respect to the separate or segregated portion, exclusive of sales of wine, of not less than   $500 and an average monthly inventory, exclusive of inventory of wine, of not less than $500."Hard Cider" means a type of wine that is derived primarily from the fermentation of apples, pears, peaches, honey, or another fruit, or from apple, pear, peach, or another fruit juice concentrate and water; contains no more than 0.64 grams of carbon dioxide per 100 milliliters; contains at least one half of one percent and less than 12 and one-half percent alcohol by volume; and is advertised, labeled, offered for sale, or sold, as hard cider or cider containing alcohol, and not as wine, wine product, or as a substitute for wine. "Hard Cider Distributor" means any person whose principal place of business is within the State of West Virginia who makes purchases from a supplier to sell or distribute hard cider, but not other types of wine, to retailers, grocery stores, private wine venues, bed and breakfasts, private wine restaurants, private wine spas, private clubs, or private club types wine specialty shops under authority of this code and maintains a warehouse in this state for the distribution of hard cider, but not other types of wine. For the purpose of a hard cider distributor, the term "person" means and includes an individual, firm, trust, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation. Any trust licensed as a distributor or any trust that is an owner of a distributor licensee, and the trustee, or any other person or persons in active control of the activities of the trust relating to the distributor license, is liable for acts of the trust or its beneficiaries relating to the distributor license that are unlawful acts or violations of this article, notwithstanding the liability of trustees in §44D-10-1 et seq. of this code."Licensee" means the holder of a license granted under the provisions of this article."Nonfortified dessert wine" means a wine that is a dessert wine to which brandy or other alcohol has not been added, and which has an alcohol content by volume of at least 15.6 percent and less than or equal to 17 percent."Person" means and includes an individual, firm, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation."Private wine bed and breakfast" means any business with the sole purpose of providing, in a residential or country setting, a hotel, motel, inn, or other such establishment properly zoned as to its municipality or local ordinances, lodging and meals to its customers in the course of their stay at the establishment, which business also: (1) Is a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, unincorporated association, or other business entity which as part of its general business purpose provides meals on its premises to its members and their guests; (2) is licensed under the provisions of this article as to all of its premises or as to a separate segregated portion of its premises to serve wine to its members and their guests when the sale accompanies the serving of food or meals; and (3) admits only duly elected and approved dues-paying members and their guests while in the company of a member and does not admit the general public."Private wine restaurant venue" means a:(1) A restaurant, as determined by the commissioner, which: (1) (i) Is a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, unincorporated association, or other business entity which has, as its principal purpose, the business of serving meals on its premises to its members and their guests; (2) is (ii) Is licensed under the provisions of this article as to all of its premises or as to a separate segregated portion of its premises to serve wine to its members and their guests when the sale accompanies the serving of food or meals; and (3) admits (iii) Admits only duly elected and approved dues-paying members and their guests while in the company of a member and does not admit the general public. Private clubs club types that meet the private wine venue - restaurant requirements in this definition shall be considered private wine venue – restaurants; Provided, That, a private wine restaurant shall (iv) Shall have at least two restrooms: Provided, however, That the two restroom requirement may be waived by a written waiver provided from a local health department to the commissioner: And provided further Provided, however, That a private wine restaurant venue located in an historic building may also be relieved of the two restroom requirement if a historic association or district with jurisdiction over a historic building provides a written waiver of the requirement to the commissioner: And provided Provided further, That in no event shall a private wine restaurant venue have less than one restroom: And provided further, That a winery or farm winery holding a private wine restaurant venue license or a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license is not subject to the food service requirements of this subdivision."Private wine spa" (2) A spa or health facility, as determined by the commissioner, means any which is a business with the sole purpose of providing commercial facilities devoted especially to health, fitness, weight loss, beauty, therapeutic services, and relaxation, and may also be a licensed massage parlor or a salon with licensed beauticians or stylists, which business also: (1) (i) Is a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, unincorporated association, or other business entity which as part of its general business purpose provides meals on its premises to its members and their guests; (2) is (ii) Is licensed under the provisions of this article as to all of its premises or as to a separate segregated portion of its premises to serve up to two glasses of wine to its members and their guests when the sale accompanies the serving of food or meals; and (3) admits (iii) Admits only duly elected and approved dues-paying members and their guests while in the company of a member, and does not admit the general public.(3) A bed and breakfast or short term rental accommodation, as determined by the commissioner, is any business with the sole purpose of providing, in a residential or country setting, a hotel, motel, inn, or other such establishment properly zoned as to its municipality or local ordinances, lodging and meals to its customers in the course of their stay at the establishment, which such business also: (i) Is a partnership, limited partnership, corporation, unincorporated association, or other business entity which as part of its general business purpose provides meals on its premises to its members and their guests; (ii) Is licensed under the provisions of this article as to all of its premises or as to a separate segregated portion of its premises to serve wine to its members and their guests when the sale accompanies the serving of food or meals; and (iii) Admits only duly elected and approved dues-paying members and their guests while in the company of a member and does not admit the general public."Retailer" means any person licensed to sell wine at retail to the public at his or her established place of business for off-premises consumption and who is licensed to do so under authority of this article. Additionally, the sale of wine shall include the sale of table wine, and special wines, such as nonfortified dessert wines, wine accessories, and food or foodstuffs normally associated with wine. If the retailer offers special wines, the retailer must: (1) Maintain a representative number of wines for sale in his or her inventory which are designated by label as varietal wine, vintage, generic, and/or according to region of production and the inventory shall contain not less than 15 percent vintage or vintage-dated wine by actual bottle count; and (2) Maintain an inventory of port, sherry, and Madeira wines having an alcoholic content of not more than 24 percent alcohol by volume and which have been matured in wooden barrels or casks. All wine available for sale shall be for off-premises consumption except where wine tasting or wine sampling is separately authorized by this code."Supplier" means any manufacturer, producer, processor, winery, farm winery, national distributor, or other supplier of wine who sells or offers to sell or solicits or negotiates the sale of wine to any licensed West Virginia distributor."Table wine" means a wine with an alcohol content by volume between 0.5 percent and  15.5 percent."Tax" includes within its meaning interest, additions to tax, and penalties."Taxpayer" means any person liable for any tax, interest, additions to tax, or penalty under the provisions of this article, and any person claiming a refund of tax."Varietal wine" means any wine labeled according to the grape variety from which the wine is made."Vintage wine" or "vintage-dated wine" means wines from which the grapes used to produce the wine are harvested during a particular year, or wines produced from the grapes of a particular harvest in a particular region of production."Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by the natural fermentation of the natural content of grapes, other fruits, or honey or other agricultural products containing sugar to which no alcohol has been added and includes table wine, hard cider, nonfortified dessert wine, wine coolers, and other similar wine-based beverages. Fortified wine and any product defined as or contained within the definition of nonintoxicating beer under the provisions of §11-16-1 et seq., of this code are excluded from this definition of wine. "Wine specialty shop" means a retailer who deals principally in the sale of table wine, nonfortified dessert wines, wine accessories, and food or foodstuffs normally associated with wine and: (1) Who maintains a representative number of wines for sale in his or her inventory which are designated by label as varietal wine, vintage, generic, and/or according to region of production and the inventory shall contain not less than 15 percent vintage or vintage-dated wine by actual bottle count; and (2) who, any other provisions of this code to the contrary notwithstanding, may maintain an inventory of port, sherry, and Madeira wines having an alcoholic content of not more than  24 percent alcohol by volume and which have been matured in wooden barrels or casks. All wine available for sale shall be for off-premises consumption except where wine tasting or wine sampling is separately authorized by this code. §60-8-3. Licenses; fees; general restrictions. (a) No person may engage in business in the capacity of a winery, farm winery, supplier, distributor, retailer, private wine venue bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, private wine spa, or wine specialty shop without first obtaining a license from the commissioner, nor shall a person continue to engage in any activity after his or her license has expired, been suspended, or revoked. No person may be licensed simultaneously as a distributor and a retailer. No person, except for a winery or farm winery, may be licensed simultaneously as a supplier and a retailer. No person except for a winery or farm winery holding a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license may be licensed simultaneously as a supplier and a private wine venue. bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, or a private wine spa. No person may be licensed simultaneously as a distributor and a private wine venue. bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, or a private wine spa. No person except for a winery or farm winery or holding a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license may be licensed simultaneously as a retailer and a private wine venue. bed and breakfast, a private wine restaurant, or a private wine spa. Any person who is licensed to engage in any business concerning the manufacture, sale, or distribution of wine may also engage in the manufacture, sale, or distribution of hard cider without obtaining a separate hard cider license. (b) The commissioner shall collect an annual fee for licenses issued under this article as follows:(1) One hundred fifty dollars per year for a supplier’s license;(2) Two thousand five hundred dollars per year for a distributor’s license and each separate warehouse or other facility from which a distributor sells, transfers, or delivers wine shall be separately licensed and there shall be collected with respect to each location, the annual license fee of $2,500 as provided in this subdivision;(3) One hundred fifty dollars per year for a retailer’s license;(4) Two hundred fifty (3) Five hundred dollars per year for a wine specialty shop retailer license, in addition to any other licensing fees paid by a winery or retailer holding a license. Except for the amount of the license fee and the restriction to sales of winery or farm winery wines, a winery, or farm winery acting as a wine specialty shop retailer with special wines is subject to all other provisions of this article which are applicable to a wine specialty shop retailer as defined in §60-8-2 of this code. Notwithstanding the Class B off-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, this license shall include the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for off-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class B off-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code;(5) One hundred fifty dollars per year (4) No fee for a wine tasting license;(6) One hundred fifty (5) Five hundred dollars per year for a private wine venue bed and breakfast license. Each separate bed and breakfast private wine venue from which a licensee sells wine shall be separately licensed and there shall be collected with respect to each location the annual license fee of $150 $500 as provided in this subdivision. Notwithstanding the Class A on-premises fees set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, this license includes the sale of nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer for on-premises consumption as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code;(7) Two hundred fifty dollars per year for a private wine restaurant license. Each separate restaurant from which a licensee sells wine shall be separately licensed and there shall be collected with respect to each location the annual license fee of $250 as provided in this subdivision;(8) One hundred fifty dollars per year for a private wine spa license. Each separate private wine spa from which a licensee sells wine shall be separately licensed and there shall be collected with respect to each location the annual license fee of $150 as provided in this subdivision;(9) One hundred fifty dollars per year (6) No fee for a wine sampling license issued for a wine retailer; specialty shopunder subsection (n) of this section;(10) (7) No fee for a special one-day license under subsection (p) of this section or for a heritage fair and festival license under subsection (q) of this section; (11) (8) One hundred fifty dollars per year for a direct shipper’s license for a licensee who sells and ships only wine and $250 per year for a direct shipper’s license who ships and sells wine, nonfortified dessert wine, port, sherry, or Madeira wines; (12) (9) Three hundred fifty dollars per year for a multi-capacity winery or farm winery license which enables the holder to operate as a retailer, wine specialty shop, supplier, and direct shipper without obtaining an individual license for each capacity; and(13) (10) Two hundred fifty dollars per year for a hard cider distributor’s license. Each separate warehouse or other facility from which a distributor sells, transfers, or delivers hard cider shall be separately licensed and there shall be collected with respect to each location the annual license fee of $250 as provided in this subdivision: Provided, That if a licensee is licensed as a nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating beer distributor, then there is no additional license fee to distribute hard cider.(c) The license period begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of the following year.  and if granted for a less period, the fee shall be computed semiannually in proportion to the remainder of the fiscal year.(d) No retailer may be licensed as a private club type as provided by §60-7-1 et seq. of this code, except as provided by subsection (k) of this section.(e) No A retailer may be licensed as a Class A Class B retail dealer in nonintoxicating beer as provided by §11-16-1 et seq. of this code. Provided, That a delicatessen, a caterer, or party supply store, which is a grocery store as defined in §60-8-2 of this code, and which is licensed as a Class A retail dealer in nonintoxicating beer may be a retailer under this article: Provided, however, That any delicatessen, caterer, or party supply store licensed in both capacities shall maintain average monthly sales exclusive of sales of wine and nonintoxicating beer which exceed the average monthly sales of nonintoxicating beer.(f) A wine specialty shop retailer under this article may also hold a wine tasting license authorizing the retailer to serve complimentary samples of wine in moderate quantities for tasting. The wine specialty shop retailer shall organize a wine taster’s club, which has at least 50 duly elected or approved dues-paying members in good standing. The club shall meet on the wine specialty shop’s retailer’s premises not more than one time per week and shall either meet at a time when the premises are closed to the general public, or meet in a separate segregated facility on the premises to which the general public is not admitted. Attendance at tastings shall be limited to duly elected or approved dues-paying members and their guests. There is no additional fee for a wine tasting license.(g) A retailer who has more than one place of retail business shall obtain a license for each separate retail establishment. A retailer’s license may be issued only to the proprietor or owner of a bona fide grocery store or wine specialty shop.(h)(1) The commissioner may issue a license for the retail sale of wine at any fair or festival which is endorsed or sponsored by the governing body of a municipality or a county commission. The license shall be issued for a term of no longer than 10 consecutive days and the fee for the license is $250 regardless of the term of the license. The application for the license shall contain information required by the commissioner and shall be submitted to the commissioner at least 30 days prior to the first day when wine is to be sold at the any fair or festival. (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, if the applicant for the  fair or festival  license is the manufacturer of the wine, a winery, or a farm winery as defined in §60-1-5a of this code, and the event is located on the premises of a winery or a farm winery, then the license fee is $50 per fair or festival.(3) A licensed winery or a farm winery, which has the fair or festival licensee’s written authorization and approval from the commissioner, may, in addition to, or in conjunction with the fair and festival licensee, exhibit, conduct complimentary tastings, or sell samples not to exceed six, three-fluid ounce, tastings or samples per patron, or serve wine by the glass for consumption on the premises during the operation of a fair or festival only; and may sell wine by the bottle for on-premises consumption, when consumed by the glass, and sealed bottles of wine for off-premises consumption: Provided, That for licensed wineries or farm wineries at a licensed fair or festival; tastings, samples, on-premises sales, and off-premises sales shall occur under the hours of operation as required in this article, except on Sunday, tastings, samples, and off-premises sales are unlawful between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m.(4) A fair or festival license may be issued to a "wine club" as defined in this subdivision for a license fee of $250. A wine club meeting requirements in this subdivision may obtain a license to operate with members. The festival or fair committee or the governing body The wine club shall designate a person to organize a club under a name which includes the name of the fair or festival and the words "wine club". The license shall be issued in the name of the wine club. The wine club license has no fee for the license. A licensee A wine club, approved by the commissioner, who has at least 50 verified due paying members may not sell wine as provided in this subdivision until the wine club has at least 50 dues-paying members who have been enrolled, and to whom membership cards have been issued. Thereafter, new members may be enrolled and issued membership cards at any time during the period for which the license is issued. carry wine, in sufficient quantities, on to the licensed premises of a private wine venue or a private club type when lawfully purchased from a wine retailer, winery, farm winery, or direct shipper for purpose of conducting a wine club tasting dinner for its members and guests. The private wine venue or private club type must agree to permitting the wine club to carry on the wine bottles for the purposes of a wine tasting dinner to its licensed premises. A wine club licensed under the provisions of this subdivision may either take, remove, or destroy all open and unconsumed wine used in the wine tasting dinner, or the open and unconsumed wine bottles may be re-corked and resealed as provided subsection (j) of this section. may sell wine only to its members, and in portions not to exceed eight ounces per serving. The sales shall take place on-premises or in an area cordoned or segregated so as to be closed to the general public, and the general public shall not be admitted to the premises or area. A wine club licensee under the provisions of this subdivision may serve complimentary samples of wine in moderate quantities for to its members and guests at a wine tasting dinner. A wine club may not make wine purchases from a direct shipper where the wine may be consumed on the licensed premises of any Class A private wine retail licensee or private club licensee. A wine club which violates the provisions of this subdivision is subject to the penalties in this article.(5) A licensed winery or farm winery approved to participate in a fair or festival  under the provisions of this section and the licensee holding the license, or the licensed winery or farm winery approved to attend a licensed fair or festival, is subject to all other provisions of this article and the rules and orders of the commissioner relating to the license: Provided, That the commissioner may by rule or order provide for certain waivers or exceptions with respect to the provisions, rules, or orders required by the circumstances of each fair or festival, including, without limitation, the right to revoke or suspend any license issued pursuant to this section prior to any notice or hearing notwithstanding the provisions §60-8-27 and §60-8-28 of this code: Provided, however, That under no circumstances shall the provisions of §60-8-20(c) or §60-8-20(d) of this code, be waived nor shall any exception be granted with respect to those subsections.(6) A license issued under the provisions of this section and the licensee holding the license are not subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this section.(7) An unlicensed winery temporarily licensed and meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (q) of this section may conduct the same sampling and sales set forth in subsection (q) of this section at a licensed fair and festival upon approval of the licensee holding the fair and festival license and temporary and limited licensure by the commissioner. An unlicensed winery is subject to the same limits, fees, requirements, restrictions, and penalties set forth in subsection (q) of this section: Provided, That the commissioner may by rule or order provide for certain waivers or exceptions with respect to the provisions, rules, or orders required by the circumstances of each fair or festival. The commissioner may revoke or suspend any license issued pursuant to this section prior to any notice or hearing notwithstanding the provisions §60-8-27 and §60-8-28 of this code: Provided, however, That under no circumstances shall the provisions of §60-8-20(c) or §60-8-20(d) of this code be waived nor shall any exception be granted with respect to those subsections.(i)(1) The commissioner may issue a special license for the retail sale of wine in a professional baseball stadium. A license to sell wine granted pursuant to this subsection entitles the licensee to sell and serve wine for consumption in a professional baseball stadium. For the purpose of this subsection, "professional baseball stadium" means a facility constructed primarily for the use of a major or minor league baseball franchisee affiliated with the National Association of Professional Baseball Leagues, Inc., or its successor, and used as a major or minor league baseball park. Any special license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be for a term beginning on the date of issuance and ending on the next following June 30, and its fee is $250 regardless of the length of the term of the license. The application for the special license shall contain information required by the commissioner and must be submitted to the commissioner at least 30 days prior to the first day when wine is to be sold at the professional baseball stadium. The special license may be issued in the name of the baseball franchisee or the name of the primary food and beverage vendor under contract with the baseball franchisee. These sales must take place within the confines of the professional baseball stadium. The exterior of the area where wine sales may occur shall be surrounded by a fence or other barrier prohibiting entry except upon the franchisee’s express permission, and under the conditions and restrictions established by the franchisee, so that the wine sales area is closed to free and unrestricted entry by the general public.(2) A license issued under this subsection and the licensee holding the license are subject to all other provisions of this article and the rules and orders of the commissioner relating to the special license: Provided, That the commissioner may by rule or order grant certain waivers or exceptions to those rules or orders required by the circumstances of each professional baseball stadium. The commissioner may revoke or suspend any license issued pursuant to this section prior to any notice or hearing notwithstanding §60-8-27 and §60-8-28 of this code: Provided, however, That under no circumstances may §60-8-20(c) or §60-8-20(d) of this code be waived nor shall any exception be granted concerning those subsections.(3) The commissioner may propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement this subsection.(j) A license to sell wine granted to a private wine venue bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, private wine spa, or a private club type under the provisions of this article entitles the operator to sell and serve wine, for consumption on the premises of the licensee, when the sale accompanies the serving of food or a meal to its members and their guests in accordance with the provisions of this article: Provided, That a licensed private wine venue bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, private wine spa, or a private club type may permit a person over 21 years of age to purchase wine, consume wine, and recork or reseal, using a tamper resistant cork or seal, up to two separate bottles of unconsumed wine in conjunction with the serving of food or a meal to its members and their guests in accordance with the provisions of this article and in accordance with rules promulgated by the commissioner for the purpose of consumption of the wine off premises: Provided, however, That a licensed private wine venue restaurant or a private club type may offer for sale, for consumption off-premises, sealed bottles of wine to its customers provided that no more than one bottle is sold per each person over 21 years of age, as verified by the private wine venue restaurant or private club type, for consumption off-premises. The licensees may keep and maintain on its premises a supply of wine in quantities appropriate for the conduct of operations thereof. Any sale of wine is subject to all restrictions set forth in §60-8-20 of this code. A private wine venue restaurant may also be licensed as a Class A retail dealer in nonintoxicating beer as provided by §11-16-1 et seq. of this code and notwithstanding the provisions of §11-16-1 et seq. of this code, there shall be no additional fee for the Class A retail dealer license, and any other nonintoxicating beer or nonintoxicating craft beer services or privileges available to such Class A on-premises licenses as set forth in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code for no additional fee, but subject to all requirements in §11-16-1 et seq. of this code.(k) With respect to subsections (h), (i), (j), (o), and (p) of this section, the commissioner shall propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with §29A-1-1 et seq. of this code, including, but not limited to, the form of the applications and the suitability of both the applicant and location of the licensed premises.(l) The commissioner shall propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with the provisions of §29A-1-1 et seq. of this code to allow restaurants private wine venues or private club types to serve wine with meals and to sell wine by the bottle for off-premises consumption as provided in subsection (j) of this section. Each licensed restaurant shall be charged an additional $100 per year fee. There is no additional fee for this privilege, but the licensee must be in good standing with the commissioner to retain the privilege. (m) The commissioner shall establish guidelines to permit wines to be sold in all stores licensed for retail sales.(n) Wineries and farm wineries may advertise off premises as provided in §17-22-7 of this code.(o) A licensed wine specialty shop retailer with special wines under this article may also hold a wine sampling license authorizing the wine specialty shop retailer to conduct special wine sampling events at its location during regular hours of business. The wine specialty shop retailer may serve up to six complimentary samples of wine, consisting of no more than three fluid ounces each, to any one consumer per day. Persons serving the samples shall be 21 years of age or older and an authorized representative of the licensed wine specialty shop retailer, winery, farm winery, or a representative of a distributor or registered supplier. Distributor and supplier representatives attending wine sampling events shall register with the commissioner. No licensee, employee, or representative may furnish, give, sell, or serve samples of wine to any person less than 21 years of age or to a person who is physically incapacitated due to the consumption of alcoholic liquor or the use of drugs. The wine specialty shop retailer shall notify and secure permission from the commissioner for all wine sampling events 30 days prior to the event. Wine sampling events may not exceed six hours per calendar day. Licensees shall purchase all wines used during these events from a licensed farm winery or a licensed distributor.(p) The commissioner may issue special one-day licenses to duly organized, nonprofit corporations and associations allowing the sale and serving of wine, and may, if applicable, also allow the charitable auctioning of certain sealed bottles of wine for off-premises consumption only, when raising money for athletic, charitable, educational, or religious purposes. "Auction or auctioning", for the purposes of this subsection, means any silent, physical act, or verbal bid auction, whether or not the auction requires in-presence bidding or online Internet-based electronic bidding through a secure application or website, but shall not include any action in violation of §47-20-10, §47-20-11, or §61-10-1 et seq. of this code. The license application shall contain information required by the commissioner and shall be submitted to the commissioner at least 30 days prior to the event. Accompanying the license application, the applicant shall submit a signed and notarized statement that at least 80 percent of the net proceeds from the charitable event will be donated directly to the nonprofit corporation or organization. Wines used during these events may be donated by, or purchased from, a licensed retailer, a distributor, winery, or a farm winery. A licensed winery or farm winery which is authorized in writing by a representative of the duly organized, nonprofit corporation or association which has obtained the one-day license; is in good standing with the state; and obtains the commissioner’s approval prior to the one-day license event may, in conjunction with the one-day licensee, exhibit, conduct complimentary tastings, sell samples not to exceed six, three-fluid ounce tastings or samples per patron, sell wine by the glass or by the bottle, when consumed by the glass, for consumption on-premises during the operation of the one-day license event, and may sell certain sealed wine bottles manufactured by the licensed winery or farm winery for off-premises consumption: Provided, That for a licensed winery or farm winery at a licensed one-day event, the tastings, samples, on-premises sales, and off-premises sales of its wine shall occur under the hours of operation permitted by this article, except on Sunday, tastings, samples, on-premises sales, and off-premises sales of its wine are unlawful between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and  6:00 a.m., from the one-day licensee’s submitted floor plan for the event subject to the requirements in the code and rules. Under no circumstances may the provisions of §60-8-20(c) or §60-8-20(f) of this code be waived nor may any exception be granted with respect to those subsections. (q)(1) In addition to the authorization granted to licensed wineries and farm wineries in subsections (h) and (p) of this section, an unlicensed winery, regardless of its designation in another state, that is duly licensed in its domicile state, may pay a $150 nonrefundable and non-prorated fee and submit an application for temporary licensure on a one-day basis for temporary sampling and sale of wine in sealed containers for off-premises consumption at a special one-day license nonprofit event.(2) The application shall include, but is not limited to, the person or entity’s name, address, taxpayer identification number, and location; a copy of its licensure in its domicile state; a signed and notarized verification that it produces 50,000 gallons or less of wine per year; a signed and notarized verification that it is in good standing with its domicile state; copies of its federal certificate of label approvals and certified lab alcohol analysis for the wines it desires to temporarily provide samples and temporarily sell wine in sealed containers for off-premises consumption at a special one-day license for a nonprofit event issued under subsection (p) of this section; and any other information as the commissioner may reasonably require: Provided, That the background investigation requirement set forth in §60-8-16 of this code is inapplicable to licenses authorized by this subdivision.(3) The applicant winery shall include a list of all wines proposed to be temporarily sampled and temporarily sold by the glass or bottle, when consumed by the glass, for on-premises consumption or in sealed containers for off-premises consumption at a special one-day license for a nonprofit event so that the wines may be reviewed in the interest of public health and safety. Once approved, the submitted wine list creates a temporary wine brand registration for up to two special one-day licenses for a nonprofit event for no additional fee.(4) An applicant winery that receives this temporary special one-day license for a nonprofit event shall provide the commissioner a signed and notarized written agreement acknowledging that the applicant winery understands its responsibility to pay all municipal, local, and sales taxes applicable to the sale of wine in West Virginia.(5) An application must be submitted for each special one-day license for a nonprofit event the applicant winery desires to attend, and the license fee shall cover up to two special one-day licenses for nonprofit events before an additional fee is required. In no circumstance would the winery be permitted to attend more than four special one-day licensed events. Any applicant or unlicensed winery desiring to attend more than four special one-day license for nonprofit events per year or otherwise operate in West Virginia would need to seek appropriate licensure as a winery or a farm winery in this state.(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of this article and requirements for licensure, wine brand registration, payment of wine liter tax, and the winery’s appointment of suppliers and distributors, this temporary special one-day license for a nonprofit event, once granted, permits a winery to operate in this limited capacity only at the approved specific, special one-day license for a nonprofit event subject to the limitations contained in this section.(7) The applicant winery shall also apply for and receive a transportation permit to legally transport wine in the state per §60-6-12 of this code.(8) The applicant winery is subject to all applicable violations and/or penalties under this article and the legislative rules that are not otherwise excepted by this subsection: Provided, That the commissioner may by rule or order provide for certain waivers or exceptions with respect to the provisions, rules, or orders required by the circumstances of each fair or festival. The commissioner may revoke or suspend any license issued pursuant to this article, prior to any notice or hearing.(r) The commissioner may issue special licenses to heritage fairs and festivals allowing the sale, serving, and sampling of wine from a licensed farm winery. The license application shall contain information required by the commissioner and shall be submitted to the commissioner at least 30 days prior to the event. Wines used during these events may be donated by or purchased from a licensed farm winery. Under no circumstances may the provision of §60-8-20(c) of this code be waived nor may any exception be granted with respect thereto. The commissioner shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this subsection.(s)(1) The commissioner may issue a special license for the retail sale of wine in a college or university stadium. A license to sell wine granted pursuant to this subsection entitles the licensee to sell and serve wine for consumption in a college or university stadium. For the purpose of this subsection, "college stadium" means a facility constructed primarily for the use of a Division I, II, or III college or university that is a member of the National Collegiate Athletic Association, or its successor, and used as a football, basketball, baseball, soccer, or other Division I, II, or III sports stadium. A special license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be for a term beginning on the date of its issuance and ending on the next following June 30, and its fee is $250 regardless of the length of the term of the license. The application for the special license shall contain information required by the commissioner and must be submitted to the commissioner at least 30 days prior to the first day when wine is to be sold. The special license may be issued in the name of the National Collegiate Athletic Association Division I, II, or III college or university or the name of the primary food and beverage vendor under contract with that college or university. All sales must take place within the confines of the college or university stadium: Provided, That the exterior of the area where wine sales may occur shall be surrounded by a fence or other barrier prohibiting entry except upon the college or university’s express permission, and under the conditions and restrictions established by the college or university, so that the wine sales area is closed to free and unrestricted entry by the general public.(2) A license issued under this subsection and the licensee are subject to the other requirements of this article and the rules and orders of the commissioner relating to the special license: Provided, That the commissioner may by rule or order grant certain waivers or exceptions to those rules or orders as required by the circumstances of each the college or university stadium. The commissioner may revoke or immediately suspend any license issued pursuant to this section prior to any notice or hearing notwithstanding §60-8-27 and §60-8-28 of this code: Provided, however, That §60-8-20(c) or §60-8-20(d) of this code may not be waived, nor shall any exception be granted concerning those subsections.(3) The commissioner may propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement this subsection. §60-8-3a. Certain wine specialty shops retailers operating as grocery stores authorized to deliver wine curbside, mobile applications, or web-based sales allowed; permits; fees. (a) A wine specialty shop retailer which is licensed to sell wine off premises and which operates a grocery store containing over $100,000 of fresh produce and saleable food and food products fit for human consumption in a combination of displayed and stored inventory may apply for a Class B license privilege granting the licensee the ability to complete the sale of such wine in the original sealed container for off-premises consumption to a person purchasing wine ordered via a mobile application or web-based software program and picking up the wine from the licensee while in a vehicle: (a) (1) If the vehicle is parked in a licensed parking area which is contiguous to the Class B licensee’s licensed premises; or(b) (2) If the vehicle is parked in a licensed parking area which is within 500 feet of the Class B licensee’s licensed premises;(c) (3) The parking area referenced in subdivision (b) of this section shall be designated by signage solely for the use of persons who have previously ordered items, including, but not limited to, wine using a mobile application or web-based software program;(d) (4) No wine may be loaded into a vehicle under this section unless the wine specialty shop retailer or the licensee’s staff have verified that both the person placing the order and the person picking up the order, if different from the person placing the order, is 21 years of age or older and is not noticeably intoxicated;(e) (5) To operate under this section a wine specialty shop retailer must be in good standing with the commissioner, apply, qualify, pay the Class B license privilege fee, and obtain the permit for the Class B licensee privilege for wine at a designated parking area. The Class B license privilege permit is nonrefundable and a nonprorated annual fee is $250;  (f) (6) The licensee is subject to all requirements, penalties, and sanctions of this article. §60-8-6a. Direct shipper's license. (a) Before sending any shipment of wine to a resident of West Virginia, the direct shipper must first:(1) File a license application with the commissioner with the appropriate background check information, using forms required by the commissioner. Criminal background checks will not be required of applicants licensed in their state of domicile who can provide a certificate of good standing from their state of domicile;(2) Pay to the commissioner either the $150 license fee to ship and sell only wine, the $250 license fee to ship and sell wine and nonfortified dessert wine, port, sherry, or Madeira wines, or the $300 multicapacity winery or farm winery license fee;(3) Obtain a business registration number from the Tax Commissioner;(4) Register with the office of the Secretary of State, if a corporation;(5) Provide the commissioner a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage license issued in the state of domicile, proving that the direct shipper is licensed in its state of domicile as a winery, farm winery, supplier or retailer of wine;(6) Obtain from the commissioner a direct shipper's license;(7) Submit to the commissioner a list of all brands of wine to be shipped to West Virginia residents; and(8) Meet all other licensing requirements of this chapter and provide any other information that the commissioner may reasonably require.(b) All direct shipper licensees shall:(1) Not ship more than two cases of wine per month to any person. A case is defined as any combination of packages containing not more than nine liters of wine;(2) Not ship to any address in an area identified by the commissioner as a "dry" or local option area where it is unlawful to sell wine or alcoholic liquors;(3) Not ship to any licensed suppliers, distributors, retailers, private wine venues, or private club types; bed and breakfasts, private wine restaurants, private wine spas or wine specialty shops;(4) Not ship wine from overseas or internationally unless it is first shipped to a licensed supplier or distributor;(5) Ensure that all containers of wine shipped directly to a resident in this state are clearly and conspicuously labeled with the words "CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY";(6) File monthly returns to the commissioner and the Tax Commissioner showing the total of wines, by type, sold, and shipped into West Virginia for the preceding month;(7) Pay to the Tax Commissioner all sales taxes, municipal taxes, and the liter tax due on sales and shipments to residents of West Virginia in the preceding month, the amount of such taxes to be calculated as the sales were made in West Virginia at the location where delivery is made;(8) Permit the Tax Commissioner or commissioner or their designees to perform an audit of the direct shipper's records upon request;(9) Be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the commissioner or any other state agency, the Kanawha County circuit court located in Charleston, West Virginia, concerning enforcement of this article and any other related laws, rules; and(10) Provide proof or records to the commissioner, upon request, that all direct shipments of wine were purchased and delivered to an adult resident of West Virginia over the age of twenty-one years of age.(c) The direct shipper may annually renew its license with the commissioner by application, paying the direct shipper license fee, and providing the commissioner with a true copy of a current alcoholic beverage license from the direct shipper's domicile state.(d) The commissioner may promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this law.(e) The commissioner may enforce the requirements of this section by administrative proceedings to suspend or revoke a direct shipper's license, and the commissioner may accept payment of a penalty or an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension, at the commissioner's discretion.(f) Shipments of wine direct to consumers in West Virginia from persons who do not possess a current direct shipper's license or other permit or license from the commissioner are prohibited. Any person who knowingly makes, participates in, transports, imports or receives such an unlicensed and unauthorized direct shipment is guilty of a felony and, shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined in an amount not to exceed $10,000 per violation or shall be imprisoned in jail for a period not to exceed seventy-two 72 hours. Without limitation on any punishment or remedy, criminal or civil, any person who knowingly makes, participates in, transports, imports or receives such a direct shipment constitutes an act that is an unfair trade practice. §60-8-6b. Deliveries by licensed wine specialty shop retailer with special wines. (a) A wine specialty shop retailer offering special wines with a current active license and in good standing with the commissioner may apply for the additional license privilege of delivering wine with a gift basket, to the purchaser or other person designated by the purchaser, as provided in this section. (b) The wine specialty shop retailer offering special wines: (1) May only deliver in the county where the wine specialty shop retailer is located with all sales and municipal taxes accounted for and paid, as long as such county is not a dry county or such county does not contain dry local option areas. The delivery of wine is not permitted in a dry county or the dry local option areas;(2) Shall ensure that all wine delivered is sealed in the original container and is clearly and conspicuously labeled with the words "CONTAINS ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY"; (3) Shall provide proof or records to the commissioner by filing monthly returns to the commissioner, on a form as prescribed by the commissioner, and the Tax Commissioner of all deliveries of wine which were purchased by and delivered to a person at least 21 years of age in the wine specialty shop’s retailer’s county of operation;(4) Shall only deliver wine with a gift basket to addresses within the State of West Virginia and within the requirements noted in this subsection;(5) Shall not deliver in excess of two cases of wine with a gift basket per month to any person or address;(6) Shall not deliver wine to any private club, type, private wine venue, or restaurant, wine retailer, private wine bed and breakfast, or private wine spa tavern; and(7) May only deliver wine with a gift basket for personal use and not for resale to a person. The wine shall not be delivered and left at any address without verifying a person’s age and identification as required in this section.(c) The nonprorated, nonrefundable fee for the additional wine specialty shop retailer with special wines delivery license privilege is $250.(d) The wine delivered by the authority of this section may be ordered or purchased by telephonic, electronic, mobile, or web-based wine ordering when the purchaser is verified to be 21 years of age or older and must be delivered by an officer or employee of the wine specialty shop retailer licensee who is 21 years of age or older. If the person receiving the delivery is not the purchaser, the licensee must verify that the person receiving the wine is 21 years of age or older and not noticeably intoxicated prior to completing the delivery. Nonlicensed third parties may not deliver wine with a gift basket on behalf of a licensed wine specialty shop retailer.(e) Any vehicle delivering wine in a gift basket shall meet the permit requirements set forth in this chapter.(f) The commissioner may propose rules for promulgation in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to effectuate the purposes of this section. §60-8-6c. Winery and farm winery license to sell wine growlers and provide samples prior to purchasing a wine growler. (a) Legislative findings. — The Legislature hereby finds that it is in the public interest to regulate, control, and support the brewing, manufacturing, distribution, sale, consumption, transportation, and storage of wine and its industry in this state to protect the public health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this state, and promote hospitality and tourism. Therefore, this section authorizes a licensed winery or farm winery with its principal place of business and manufacture located in this state to have certain abilities to promote the sale of wine manufactured in this state for the benefit of the citizens of this state, the state’s growing wine industry, and the state’s hospitality and tourism industry, all of which are vital components for the state's economy.(b) Sales of wine. — A licensed winery or farm winery with its principal place of business and manufacture located in the State of West Virginia may, when licensed under this section, offer only wine manufactured by the licensed winery or farm winery for retail sale to customers from the winery or farm winery's licensed premises for consumption off-premises only in the form of original container sealed wine kegs, wine bottles, or wine cans, or also a sealed wine growler for personal consumption, and not for resale. A licensed winery or farm winery may not sell, give, or furnish its wine for consumption on the premises of the principal place of business and manufacture located in the State of West Virginia, except for the limited purpose of samples as permitted in subsection (c) of this section, for on-premises sales in accordance with §60-4-3b of this code, or for on-premises sales when separately licensed as a private wine venue restaurant or a private venue - alcohol manufacturer club.(c) Samples. — A licensed winery or farm winery with its principal place of business and manufacture located in the State of West Virginia may offer samples of wine as set forth in §60-4-3b of this code.(d) Retail sales. — Every licensed winery or farm winery under this section shall comply with all the provisions of this article as applicable to wine retailers when conducting wine growler sales and is subject to all applicable requirements and penalties in this article.(e) Payment of taxes and fees. — A winery or farm winery licensed under this section shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed wine retailers, in addition to any other taxes and fees required, and shall meet applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rule of the commissioner.(f) Advertising. — A licensed winery or farm winery under this section may advertise a particular brand or brands of wine produced by the licensed winery or farm winery and the price of the wine subject to state and federal requirements or restrictions. The advertisement may not encourage intemperance or target minors.(g) Wine Growler defined. — For purposes of this section and section §60-8-6d of the code, "wine growler" means a container or jug that is made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the commissioner, that may be no larger than 128 fluid ounces in size and is capable of being securely sealed. The growler may be used by an authorized licensee for purposes of off-premises sales only of wine for personal consumption, and not for resale. The wine served and sold in a sealed wine growler may include ice or water mixed with the wine to create a frozen alcoholic beverage. Any frozen alcoholic beverage machine used for filling wine growlers shall be sanitized daily and shall be under control and served by the licensee from the secure area. Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, a securely sealed wine growler is not an open container under state and local law. A wine growler with a broken seal is an open container under state and local law unless it is located in an area of the motor vehicle physically separated from the passenger compartment. For purpose of this article, a secure seal means using a tamper evident seal, such as: (1) A plastic heat shrink wrap band, strip, or sleeve extending around the cap or lid of wine growler to form a seal that is broken when the container is opened; or (2) A screw top cap or lid that breaks apart when the wine growler is opened.(h) Wine Growler requirements. — A winery or farm winery licensed under this section shall prevent patrons from accessing the secure area where the winery or farm winery fills a wine growler and prevent patrons from filling a wine growler. A licensed winery or farm winery under this section shall sanitize, fill, securely seal, and label any wine growler prior to its sale. A licensed winery or farm winery under this section may refill a wine growler subject to the requirements of this section. A winery or farm winery shall visually inspect any wine growler before filling or refilling it. A winery or farm winery may not fill or refill any wine growler that appears to be cracked, broken, unsafe, or otherwise unfit to serve as a sealed beverage container.(i) Wine Growler labeling. — A winery or farm winery licensed under this section selling wine growlers shall affix a conspicuous label on all sold and securely sealed wine growlers listing the name of the licensee selling the wine growler, the brand of the wine in the wine growler, the alcohol content by volume of the wine in the wine growler, and the date the wine growler was filled or refilled. All labeling on the wine growler shall be consistent with all federal labeling and warning requirements.(j) Wine Growler sanitation. — A licensed winery or farm winery authorized under this section shall clean and sanitize all wine growlers it fills or refills in accordance with all state and county health requirements prior to its filling and sealing. In addition, the licensed winery or farm winery shall sanitize, in accordance with all state and county health requirements, all taps, tap lines, pipelines, barrel tubes, and any other related equipment used to fill or refill growlers. Failure to comply with this subsection may result in penalties under this article.(k) Fee. — There is no additional fee for a licensed winery or farm winery authorized under this section to sell wine growlers, but the licensee shall meet all other requirements of this section.(l) Limitations on licensees. — To be authorized under this section, a licensed winery or farm winery may not produce more than 10,000 gallons of wine per calendar year at the winery or farm winery’s principal place of business and manufacture located in the State of West Virginia. A licensed winery or farm winery authorized under this section is subject to the applicable penalties under this article for violations of this section.(m) Rules. — The commissioner, in consultation with the Bureau for Public Health, may propose legislative rules concerning sanitation for legislative approval, pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, to implement this section. §60-8-6d. Wine retailer, wine specialty shop, private wine venue, restaurant, private wine bed and breakfast, private wine spa, Class B retail dealer, private club venue -  restaurant, private venue - alcohol manufacturer club, Class A retail licensee, and Class B retail licensee’s authority to sell wine growlers. (a) Legislative findings. — The Legislature hereby finds that it is in the public interest to regulate, control, and support the brewing, manufacturing, distribution, sale, consumption, transportation, and storage of wine and its industry in this state to protect the public health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this state and promote hospitality and tourism. Therefore, this section authorizes a licensed wine retailer, wine specialty shop, private wine venue, restaurant, private wine bed and breakfast, private wine spa, private club venue - restaurant, private venue - alcohol manufacturer, club, Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee to have certain abilities in order to promote the sale of wine manufactured in this state for the benefit of the citizens of this state, the state’s growing wine industry, and the state’s hospitality and tourism industry, all of which are vital components for the state’s economy.(b) Sales of wine. — A licensed wine retailer, wine specialty shop, private wine venue, restaurant, private wine bed and breakfast, private wine spa, private club venue - restaurant, private venue - alcohol manufacturer  club, Class A retail licensee, or Class B retail licensee who pays the fee in subsection (h) of this section and meets the requirements of this section may offer wine for retail sale to patrons from the licensed premises in a sealed wine growler for personal consumption off of the licensed premises, and not for resale. Prior to the sale, the licensee shall verify, using proper identification, that any patron purchasing wine is 21 years of age or over and that the patron is not visibly intoxicated. The nonprorated, nonrefundable annual fee to sell wine growlers is $100. There is no additional fee for wine growler sales.(c) Retail sales. — Every licensee authorized under this section shall comply with all the provisions of this article as applicable to wine retailers when conducting sales of wine in a wine growler and is subject to all applicable requirements and penalties in this article.(d) Payment of taxes and fees. — A licensee authorized under this section shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed wine retailers, in addition to any other taxes and fees required, and meet applicable licensing provisions as required by this chapter and by rule of the commissioner.(e) Advertising. — A licensee authorized under this section may advertise a particular brand or brands of wine and the price of the wine, subject to state and federal requirements or restrictions. The advertisement may not encourage intemperance or target minors.(f) Wine Growler defined and requirements. — A licensee authorized under this section shall use the wine growler definition and requirements in §60-8-6c(g) and §60-8-6c(h) of this code.(g) Wine Growler labeling and sanitation. — A licensee authorized under this section shall label and sanitize wine growlers as set forth in §60-8-6c(i) and §60-8-6c(j) of this code.(h) Complimentary samples. — A licensee authorized under this section may provide complimentary wine growler samples to a person intending to purchase a wine growler which may be no greater than two fluid ounces per wine growler sample and a wine growler sampling shall not exceed three complimentary two fluid ounce samples per patron per day. A licensee authorized under this section providing complimentary wine samples shall, prior to providing any samples, verify that the patron sampling wine is 21 years of age or older and that the patron is not visibly or noticeably intoxicated. (i) Limitations on licensees. — A licensee under this section may only sell wine growlers during the hours of operation set forth in this article. Any licensee licensed under this section shall maintain a secure area for the sale and filling of wine in a wine growler. The secure area shall only be accessible by the licensee. Any licensee licensed under this section is subject to the applicable penalties under this article for violations.(j) Non-applicability of certain statutes. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, licensees under this section are permitted to break the seal of the original container for the limited purpose of filling a wine growler or providing complimentary wine samples as provided in this section. Any unauthorized sale of wine or any consumption not permitted on the licensee’s licensed premises is subject to penalties under this article.(k) Rules. — The commissioner may propose legislative rules for legislative approval, pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, to implement this section. §60-8-6g. Special privilege of Class A private wine venue restaurant licensee to operate separate, but connected, Class B wine retailer specialty shop license. A Class A private wine venue - restaurant licensee may, in the commissioner's discretion, operate Class B wine specialty shop retailer license for the off-premises sale of nonintoxicating beer and wine in a connected but separately operated area of the Class A private wine restaurant is venue -restaurant’s licensed premises: Provided, That each business is licensed separately and operates separate cash registers and maintains separation barriers between the different licensed operations.  A licensee who fails to license two inner-connected businesses subjects the licensee to the penalties under this article. §60-8-16. Application for license. (a) Any person desiring a license under this article shall file a written application for a license with the commissioner and in the application shall state under oath:(1) The name of the applicant, including his or her trade name if any, his or her residence address, and the length of his or her residence;(2) The address of the place of business for which the license is desired, or other description that definitely locates it; and that the place of business conforms to all health and fire laws and regulations applicable thereto;(3) The name of the owner of the premises upon which the business is to be conducted and, if the owner is not the applicant, that the applicant is the bona fide lessee of the business;(4) If the application is for a retailer’s license, that the applicant is the proprietor or owner of a bona fide grocery store, retailer, private wine venue, or private club type; bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, private wine spa, or wine specialty shop;(5) That the applicant intends to carry on the business authorized by the license for himself or herself or under his or her immediate supervision or direction;(6) That the applicant is a citizen of the United States;(7) That the applicant shall include a manager on the applicant’s license application, or a licensee’s renewal application, and further that the manager shall meet all other requirements of an applicant for licensure set forth in this section, including, but not limited to, United States citizenship or naturalization, passing a background investigation, being at least 21 years of age, being a suitable person, being of good morals and character, and other requirements, all as set forth in the code and the legislative rules, in order for the manager to be able to meet and conduct any regulatory matters, including, but not limited to: Licensure or enforcement matters related to the applicant or licensee all in the interest of protecting public health and safety and being a suitable applicant or licensee. In order to maintain active licensure, any change by a licensee in any manager listed on an application must be made immediately to the commissioner, in order to verify that the new manager meets licensure requirements;(8) That the applicant is not less than 21 years of age;(9) That the applicant has not been convicted of a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude within the three years next preceding the filing of the application; and that he or she has not, within the two years next preceding the filing of the application, been convicted of violating the liquor laws of any state or of the United States;(10) That the applicant has not during the five years next preceding the date of said application had any license revoked under this chapter or under the liquor laws of any other state;(11) If the applicant is a firm, association, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the application shall state the matters required in subdivisions (6), (8), (9), and (10) of this subsection, with respect to each of the members and the manager thereof, and each of said members and the manager must meet all the requirements in said subdivisions;(12) If the applicant is a corporation, organized or authorized to do business in this state, the application shall state the matters required in subdivisions (6), (8), (9), and (10) of this subsection, with respect to the manager and each of the officers and directors thereof, and any stockholder owning 20 percent or more of the stock of the corporation and any other persons who conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation. Each of said individuals must meet all the requirements provided in those subdivisions except that the requirements as to citizenship may not apply to the officers, directors, and stockholders of a corporation applying for a retailer’s license; and(13) If the applicant for distributor’s license is a trust or has a trust as an owner, the trustees or other persons in active control of the activities of the trust relating to the license shall provide a certification of trust as described in §44D-10-1013 of this code. This certification of trust shall include the excerpts described in §44D-10-1013(e) of this code and shall further state, under oath, the names, addresses, Social Security numbers, and birth dates of the beneficiaries of the trust and certify that the trustee and beneficiaries are 21 years of age or older. If a beneficiary is not 21 years of age, the certification of trust must state that the beneficiary’s interest in the trust is represented by a trustee, parent, or legal guardian who is 21 years of age and who will direct all actions on behalf of the beneficiary related to the trust with respect to the distributor until the beneficiary is 21 years of age. Any beneficiary who is not 21 years of age or older shall have his or her trustee, parent, or legal guardian include in the certification of trust and state under oath his or her name, address, Social Security number, and birth date.(14) Any other information that the commissioner may reasonably require of the applicant, or licensee, or the applicant or licensee’s manager.The foregoing statements required in an application are mandatory prerequisites for the issuance of a license.The application must be verified by the owner, manager, or in the case of a firm, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, or trust, the members, officers, trustees, or other persons in active control of the activities of the limited liability company, association, or trust relating to the license. The application of a corporation applying for a retailer’s license need be verified only by its president or vice president.(b) In the case of an applicant that is a trust or has a trust as an owner, a distributor license may be issued only upon submission by the trustees or other persons in active control of the activities of the trust relating to the distributor license of a true and correct copy of the written trust instrument to the commissioner for his or her review. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the copy of the written trust instrument submitted to the commissioner pursuant to this section is confidential and is not a public record and is not available for release pursuant to the West Virginia Freedom of Information Act codified in §29B-1-1 et seq. of this code. PART IV. WINE RETAILERS. §60-8-32. Where wine may be sold at retail. Except as to sales permitted to be made by wineries or farm wineries that obtain a retailer's license or private wine venue, bed and breakfasts, private wine restaurants and private wine spas, wine sold pursuant to this article may be sold at retail only by the commissioner and in and by licensed retailers and wine specialty shops as defined by section two of this article. §60-8-34. When retail sales prohibited. It is unlawful for a retailer, winery, farm winery, wine specialty shop retailer, wine distributor, or private wine venue bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, or private wine spa licensee, his or her servants, agents, or employees to sell or deliver wine between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and  6:00 a.m. or, it is unlawful for a winery, farm winery, or private wine venue, bed and breakfast, private wine restaurant, or private wine spa, his or her servants, agents, or employees to sell wine between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 1:00 p.m. in any county upon approval as provided for in §7-1-3ss of this code, or between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and  6:00 a.m. on weekdays, Saturdays, and Sundays. ARTICLE 8A. MANUFACTURE AND SALE OF HARD CIDER. §60-8A-5. Winery or farm winery licensee's authority to manufacture, sell, and provide samples; growler sales; advertisements; taxes; fees; rulemaking. (a) Sales of hard cider. — A licensed winery or farm winery with its principal place of business or manufacturing facility located in the State of West Virginia may offer hard cider manufactured by the licensed winery or farm winery for retail sale to customers from the winery's or farm winery's licensed premises for consumption off-premises only in approved and registered hard cider kegs, bottles, or cans, or also sealed wine growlers for personal consumption and not for resale. A licensed winery or farm winery may not sell, give, or furnish hard cider for consumption on the premises of the principal place of business or manufacturing facility located in the State of West Virginia, except for the limited purpose of samples as permitted in subsection (b) of this section. "Wine Growler" has the meaning set forth in §60-8-6c(g) of this code. Customers may consume hard cider on-premises when an operator of a winery or farm winery is licensed as a private wine venue restaurant or a private venue - alcohol manufacturer club.(b) Samples. — A licensed winery or farm winery with its principal place of business or manufacturing facility located in the State of West Virginia may offer samples of hard cider manufactured at the winery's or farm winery's principal place of business or manufacturing facility located in the State of West Virginia. The samples may be no greater than three fluid ounces per sample per patron, and a sampling shall not exceed six complimentary three fluid ounce samples per patron per day. A licensed winery or farm winery providing samples shall provide food, which may be pre-packaged food not requiring kitchen preparation, items to the patron consuming the samples; and prior to any sampling, verify, using proper identification, that the patron sampling is 21 years of age or older and that the patron is not noticeably or visibly intoxicated. The winery or farm winery is subject to the hours of operation set forth in §60-8-34 of this code.(c) Retail sales. — Every licensed winery or farm winery under this section shall comply with all the provisions applicable to wine retailers when conducting sales of hard cider and is subject to all applicable requirements and penalties. A winery or a farm winery holding a private wine restaurant license or private manufacturer club license may offer for sale and service hard cider by the drink or glass or cider by the bottle when consumed by the glass on the property of the winery or farm winery. In the interest of promoting tourism throughout the state, every licensed winery or farm winery manufacturing cider in this state is authorized, with a limited off-site retail privilege at private fair and festivals, for off-premises consumption sales of the winery or farm winery's sealed hard cider. At least five days prior to an approved private fair and festival, an authorized winery or farm winery shall provide a copy of a written agreement to sell only hard cider manufactured by the licensed winery or farm winery at the private fair and festival's licensed premises. If approved, an authorized winery or farm winery may conduct on-premises and off-premises consumption sales of their hard cider from a designated booth at the private fair and festival as set forth in §60-7-8a of this code. All authorized and approved wineries and farm wineries' on-premises and off-premises consumption sales of hard cider shall comply with all retail requirements in §60-8-1 et seq. of this code and §60-8A-1 et seq. of this code, and specifically with respect to all markups, taxes, and fees. Additionally, an authorized winery or farm winery may provide, sell, and serve hard cider samples in the amounts set forth in subsection(b) of this section, hard cider by the glass or drink, or hard cider by the bottle when consumed by the glass of its hard cider for on-premises consumption to patrons who are 21 years of age and older and who are not intoxicated.(d) Payment of taxes and fees. — A licensed winery or farm winery under this section shall pay all taxes and fees required of licensed wine retailers, in addition to any other taxes and fees required, and meet applicable licensing provisions as required by law and by rule of the commissioner.(e) Advertising. — A licensed winery or farm winery may advertise a particular brand or brands of hard cider produced by the licensed winery or farm winery and the price of the hard cider subject to state and federal requirements or restrictions. The advertisement may not encourage intemperance or target minors.(f) Growler requirements. — A licensed winery or farm winery, if offering wine growler filling services, shall meet the filling, labeling, sanitation, and all other wine growler requirements in §60-8-6c of this code.(g) Fee. — There is no additional fee for a licensed winery or farm winery authorized under §60-8-6c of this code, to sell wine growlers, if a winery or farm winery only desires to sell hard cider in the wine growler, and no other wine. then the annual non-prorated and nonrefundable license fee is $50. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home